Ohio, session 136, SB217.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed in the name of the state conveying to one or more purchaser or purchasers, their heirs, successors, and assigns all of the State's right, title, and interest in the following described real estate: Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Greene, in the City of Xenia, in Virginia Military Survey 548. Beginning at the North West corner of Lot No. 12 of Block 7 of Frank W. Dodds 2nd Addition to the City of Xenia; Thence with the W line of said Lot No. 12 and the East line of Detroit Boulevard, South 20 feet to a point in the West line of said Lot; Thence at right angles to the West line of said lot, 16 feet to the point of beginning of the following description: Thence, Southwardly, parallel and 16 feet East of the West line of Lot No. 12 and Lot No. 1, 289 feet to a point 35 feet North of the North line of Park Drive; Thence, in a Northeasterly direction, parallel with the North line of Park Drive and 30 feet from the same, 444 feet to a point; Thence, in a Northwesterly direction 29 feet to a point 20 feet South of the South line of Weaver Street; Thence, in a Westerly direction, parallel with the South line of said Weaver Street and 20 feet South of same, 340 feet to the beginning of this description, containing 54,444 square feet (1.25 acres). The above described tract is parts of Lot Nos. 1 – 2 – 3 – 4 – 5 – 6 – 7 – 8 – 9 – 10 – 11 – 12 of Block No. 7 of Frank W. Dodds Second Addition to Xenia as recorded in Plat Book No. 2, Page 102 – 103 (now known as Plat Cabinet 31, Pages 267B-268A) of Greene County Plat Records. Parcel Number(s): M40000200040012600, M40000200040012700, M40000200040012800, M40000200040012900, M40000200040013000, M40000200040013100, M40000200040013200, M40000200040013300, M40000200040013400, M40000200040013500, M40000200040013600, M40000200040013700 Prior Instrument: Deed Book 145, Page 118 - Greene County Recorder The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the deed. (B)(1) The conveyance shall include the improvements and chattels situated on the real estate, and is subject to all leases, agreements, licenses, permits, memoranda of understanding, easements, covenants, conditions, reservations, and restrictions of record, and encroachments whether of record or not; all legal highways and public rights of way; zoning, building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. (2) The deed or deeds for the conveyance of the real estate may contain restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, and other terms and conditions the Director of Administrative Services determines to be in the best interest of the State. (3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the State or the Adjutant General's Department without the necessity of further legislation. (4) The real estate described above shall be conveyed only if the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of the Adjutant General's Department first have determined that the real estate is surplus real property no longer needed by the State and that the conveyance is in the best interest of the State. (C) The Director of Administrative Services shall conduct a sale of the real estate by sealed bid auction or public auction, and the real estate shall be sold to the highest bidder at a price acceptable to the Director of Administrative Services and the Adjutant General's Department. The Department of Administrative Services shall advertise the sealed bid auction or public auction by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in Greene County, once a week for three consecutive weeks before the date on which the sealed bids are to be opened. The Director of Administrative Services shall notify the successful bidder or bidders in writing. The Director of Administrative Services may reject any or all bids. The purchaser shall pay ten percent of the purchase price to the Director of Administrative Services within five business days after receiving the notice the bid has been accepted. When the deposit has been received, the Director and purchaser or purchasers shall enter into a real estate purchase agreement, in the form prescribed by the Department of Administrative Services. The purchaser or purchasers shall pay the balance of the purchase price to the Department of Administrative Services within sixty days after receiving notice the bid has been accepted, or at closing. Payment may be made by bank draft or certified check made payable to the Treasurer of State. A purchaser who does not complete the conditions of the sale as prescribed in this division shall forfeit ten percent of the purchase price paid to the State as liquidated damages. If a purchaser fails to complete the purchase, the Director of Administrative Services may accept the next highest bid, subject to the foregoing conditions. If the Director of Administrative Services rejects all bids, the Department of Administrative Services may repeat the sealed bid auction or public auction, or may use an alternative sale process that is acceptable to the Adjutant General's Department. The Adjutant General's Department shall pay advertising and other costs incident to the sale of the real estate. (D) The real estate described in division (A) of this section shall be sold as an entire tract and not in parcels. (E) Except as otherwise specified above, the purchaser shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. The proceeds of the sale of the real estate shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Fund 5340 ALI 745612, Armory Improvements, under section 5911.10 of the Revised Code. (F) Upon execution of the real estate purchase agreement, the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services for recording, and delivered to the Grantee(s). The Grantee(s) shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Greene County Recorder. (G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 2. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed in the name of the State conveying to one or more purchaser or purchasers, their heirs, successors and assigns all of the State's right, title, and interest in the following described real estate: Situated in the City of Dover, County of Tuscarawas, and State of Ohio and being part of the 3rd Quarter of Township 9, Range 2 of the United States Military Lands; being part of the tract (PN: 15-05312-000) conveyed to The State of Ohio in Vol. 538, Pg. 554 and being more fully described as follows: Beginning at the northeast corner of a tract conveyed to Ohio Department of Transportation in Vol. 1268, Pg. 2284, being 2.07 feet right of Sta. 133+30.75 of the centerline of right of way of Ohio Ave. (C.R. 80) as shown on the TUS-77-24.50 R/W Plans (2006); thence with Wooster Ave. and on the east line of said Ohio Department of Transportation tract, South 26 Degrees 48 Minutes 43 Seconds East, a distance of 121.00 feet to the southeast corner of said Ohio Department of Transportation tract and being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING for the tract hereinafter described, thence in a clockwise direction along the following eight courses; (1) Thence continuing with Wooster Ave. and on the east line of said State of Ohio tract, South 26 Degrees 48 Minutes 43 Seconds East, a distance of 87.38 feet to a point; (2) Thence through said State of Ohio tract on a new line of division, South 63 Degrees 32 Minutes 07 Seconds West, passing a 5/8-inch iron pin with cap "SHAFFER PS 8726" set at a distance of 28.90 feet, a total distance of 389.47 feet to a 5/8-inch iron pin with cap "SHAFFER PS 8726" set; (3) Thence North 69 Degrees 16 Minutes 14 Seconds West, a distance of 68.78 feet to a 3/4-inch iron pin found on the west line of said State of Ohio tract and on the east line of a 18.54 acre tract conveyed to Zimmer Orthopedic Surgical Products, Inc. in Vol. 1064, Pg. 2292; (4) Thence on said line, North 20 Degrees 37 Minutes 59 Seconds East, a distance of 318.28 feet to a 5/8-inch iron pin with cap "SHAFFER PS 8726" set on the south right of way line of said Ohio Ave. at the southwest corner of said Ohio Department of Transportation tract; (5) Thence on the south right of way line of said Ohio Ave. and the south line of said Ohio Department of Transportation tract, South 87 Degrees 03 Minutes 02 Seconds East, a distance of 162.13 feet to a 5/8-inch iron pin with cap "SHAFFER PS 8726" set at a point of curvature; (6) Thence continuing on said line with a curve to the right, having a radius of 50.00 feet, a central angle of 61 Degrees 49 Minutes 54 Seconds East, a chord bearing South 56 Degrees 08 Minutes 05 Seconds East, a chord length of 51.38 feet, an arc length of 53.96 feet to a 5/8 inch iron pin with cap "SHAFFER PS 8726" set at a point of tangency on the west right of way line of said Wooster Ave.; (7) Thence continuing on the south line of said Ohio Department of Transportation tract and the west right of way line of said Wooster Ave, South 25 Degrees 13 Minutes 08 Seconds East, a distance of 54.69 feet to an iron pin with cap "QUICKSALL" found; (8) Thence continuing on said line, North 64 Degrees 46 Minutes 52 Seconds East, passing an iron pin with cap "QUICKSALL" found at a distance of 10.01 feet, a total distance of 37.07 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING. The above described tract contains 1.734 acres, more or less, and is subject to all easements, restrictions, and covenants of record. Split from Tuscarawas County APN: 15-05312-000 The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the deed. (B)(1) The conveyance shall include the improvements and chattels situated on the real estate, and is subject to all leases, agreements, licenses, permits, memoranda of understanding, easements, covenants, conditions, reservations, and restrictions of record, and encroachments whether of record of not; all legal highways and public rights of way; zoning, building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. (2) The deed for the conveyance of the real estate may contain restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, and other terms and conditions the Director of Administrative Services determines to be in the best interest of the State. (3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the State or the Adjutant General's Department without the necessity of further legislation. (4) The real estate described above shall be conveyed only if the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of the Adjutant General's Department first have determined that the real estate is surplus real property no longer needed by the State and that the conveyance is in the best interest of the State. (C) The Director of Administrative Services shall conduct a sale of the real estate by sealed bid auction or public auction, and the real estate shall be sold to the highest bidder at a price acceptable to the Director of Administrative Services and the Adjutant General's Department. The Department of Administrative Services shall advertise the sealed bid auction or public auction by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in Tuscarawas County, once a week for three consecutive weeks before the date on which the sealed bids are to be opened. The Director of Administrative Services shall notify the successful bidder in writing. The Director of Administrative Services may reject any or all bids. The purchaser shall pay ten percent of the purchase price to the Director of Administrative Services within five business days after receiving the notice the bid has been accepted. When the deposit has been received, the Director and purchaser shall enter into a real estate purchase agreement, in the form prescribed by the Department of Administrative Services. The purchaser shall pay the balance of the purchase price to the Department of Administrative Services within sixty days after receiving notice the bid has been accepted, or at closing. Payment may be made by bank draft or certified check made payable to the Treasurer of State. A purchaser who does not complete the conditions of the sale as prescribed in this division shall forfeit the ten percent of the purchase price paid to the State as liquidated damages. If a purchaser fails to complete the purchase, the Director of Administrative Services may accept the next highest bid, subject to the foregoing conditions. If the Director of Administrative Services rejects all bids, the Department of Administrative Services may repeat the sealed bid auction or public auction, or may use an alternative sale process that is acceptable to the Adjutant General's Department. The Adjutant General's Department shall pay advertising and other costs incident to the sale of the real estate. (D) The real estate described in division (A) of this section shall be sold as an entire tract and not in parcels. (E) Except as otherwise specified above, the purchaser shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing, and conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. The proceeds of the sale of the real estate shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of 5340 ALI 745612, Armory Improvements under section 5911.10 of the Revised Code. (F) Upon execution of the real estate purchase agreement, the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services for recording, and delivered to the Grantee(s). The Grantee(s) shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Tuscarawas County Recorder. (G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 3. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed in the name of the State conveying to The Board of Education of the Eastland-Fairfield Career and Technical School District ("Grantee"), and its successors and assigns, all of the State's right, title, and interest in the following described real estate: Tract A Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, section 501.01 of the Revised Code; also being a portion of school lands as described in a Journal Entry by the Office of the Auditor of the State of Ohio, Volume 17, Page 48 (dated 7/14/1966), allocating a 40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational School District, now known as The Eastland-Fairfield Career and Technical Schools; being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 317; right-of-way varies) and the northerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in "Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46, Page 93; said point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, as recorded in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, Parcel 22-WL, said point being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning point; running, Along the northerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard, North 85° 36' 06" West for a distance of 62.95' to an iron pin set at a point of curvature; thence, Along the northerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard following a curve to the right having an arc length of 28.36', a radius of 25.00', a central angle of 65° 00' 00", and a chord that bears North 53° 06' 06" West for a distance of 26.86' to an iron pin set at a point of tangency; thence, Along the easterly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard, North 20° 36' 06" West for a distance of 216.10' to a 1" iron pipe found in the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, said point being the southwesterly corner of a 3.381 acre tract as conveyed to 4343 South Hamilton Road, LLC as described in Instrument No. 199901040000730; thence, Along the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and the southerly line of said 3.381 acre tract, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance of 170.62' to a 1" iron pipe found, said point being the southeasterly corner of said 3.381 acre tract, said point being along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road; thence, Along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road, South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 40.22' to a 1" iron pipe found; thence, Along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road, South 02° 14' 23" West for a distance of 170.20' to the point of beginning, containing 0.598 acres of land, more or less, as determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The Kleingers Group in June, 2017. Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935". Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, ordinances or agreements of record. Tract B Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, section 501.01 of the Revised Code; also being a portion of school lands as described in a Journal Entry by the Office of the Auditor of the State of Ohio, Volume 17, Page 48 (dated 7/14/1966), allocating a 40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational School District, now known as The Eastland-Fairfield Career and Technical Schools; being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 317; right-of-way varies) and the southerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in "Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46, Page 93; said point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, as recorded in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, Parcel 22-WL, said point being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning point running thence the following four courses along the westerly right-of-way lines of Hamilton Road and along westerly lines of said 7.507 acre tract: (1) South 12° 10' 08" East for a distance of 104.34' to an iron pin set; thence, (2) South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 250.00' to an iron pin set; thence, (3) South 06° 26' 22" West for a distance of 300.17' to an iron pin set; thence, (4) South 01° 15' 35" West for a distance of 160.67' to a point, said point referenced by an iron pin set that bears North 85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 5.00' from said corner, said point also being along the northerly line of a 49.736 acre tract, the residual of a 49.998 acre tract as conveyed to Madison Local School District as described in Deed Book 3336, Page 482; thence, Along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and along the northerly line of said 49.736 acre tract, North 85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 1496.33' to a point, passing over an iron pin set at a distance of 5.00' from the beginning of this course and passing over an iron pin set at a distance of 3.00' from the terminus of this course, said point also witnessed by an iron pin that bears South 04° 18' 59" West for a distance of 3.00' from said point; said point also being the southeasterly corner of a 0.2625 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077, Tract 1, said point also being the northeasterly corner of a 0.2625 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077, Tract 2, thence, Along the easterly line of said 0.2625 acre tract as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077, Tract 1 and then along the easterly line of a 4.647 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201511160161625 and then along the easterly line of a 1.6187 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 and then along the easterly line of a 2.10 acre tract as conveyed to Corporation of the Presiding Bishop of the Church of Jesus Christ of the Latter-Day Saints as described in Deed Book 3752, Page 204, North 04° 18' 59" East for a distance of 1100.52' to a 1" iron pipe found, passing over an iron pin set at a distance of 288.33' from the terminus of this course, said point being the northwesterly corner of said 40.00 acre tract, said point also being the northeasterly corner of said 2.10 acre tract, said point also being along the southerly line of a 4.410 acre tract as conveyed to Mulligan Real Estate II, LLC as described in Instrument No. 201403140031424; thence, Along the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and along the southerly line of said 4.410 acre tract and then along the southerly line of a 1.500 acre tract as conveyed to Charles and Vicki Golden as described in Instrument No. 200108140187784, Instrument No 200108140187785 and Instrument No. 200108140187788 and then along the southerly line of a 3.00 acre tract as conveyed to Kinell Properties, LLC as described in Instrument No. 201201050001830 and then along the southerly line of a 2.433 acre tract as conveyed to Peerless Saw Company as described in Official Record 8645 B-05, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance of 1224.44' to a 1" iron pipe found, said point being the southeasterly corner of said 2.433 acre tract and being along the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (60' right-of-way as dedicated in Plat Book 46, Page 93); thence, Along the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard, South 20° 36' 06" East for a distance of 320.30' to a railroad spike found; thence, Along the southerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance of 110.81' to the point of beginning, containing 36.400 acres of land, more or less, as determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The Kleingers Group in June, 2017. Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935." Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, ordinances or agreements of record. Tract C Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, section 501.01 of the Revised Code; also being a portion of school lands as described in a Journal Entry by the Office of the Auditor of the State of Ohio, Volume 17, Page 48 (dated 7/14/1966), allocating a 40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational School District, now known as The Eastland-Fairfield Career and Technical Schools; being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 317; right-of-way varies) and the southerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in "Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46, Page 93; said point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, as recorded in Deed Book 3241 Page 395 Parcel 22-WL, thence the following four courses along the westerly right-of-way lines of Hamilton Road and along westerly lines of said 7.507 acre tract: (1) South 12° 10' 08" East for a distance of 104.34' to an iron pin set; thence, (2) South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 250.00' to an iron pin set; thence, (3) South 06° 26' 22" West for a distance of 300.17' to an iron pin set; thence, (4) South 01° 15' 35" West for a distance of 160.67' to a point, said point referenced by an iron pin set that bears North 85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 5.00' from said corner, said point also being along the northerly line of a 49.736 acre tract, the residual of a 49.998 acre tract as conveyed to Madison Local School District as described in Deed Book 3336, Page 482; said point being the thence, Along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and along the northerly line of said 49.736 acre tract and then along a common line between two 0.2625 acre tracts as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077, Tracts 1 and 2, North 85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 1877.52' to an iron pin set, passing over an iron pins set at a distance of 5.00' and at a distance of 1493.33 from the beginning of this course, said point being along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, said point also being a common corner of said 49.736 acre tract and said 0.2625 acre tracts, said point also being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning point running thence, Along a common line between said 40.00 acre tract and said 49.736 acre tract, North 85° 35' 53" West for a distance of 280.18' to a point generally along Black Lick Creek, said point witnessed by a 1" iron pipe found that bears South 53° 43' 34" East for a distance of 0.93' from said point; thence, Along a westerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and generally following Black Lick Creek, North 48° 01' 47" West for a distance of 49.20' to a point, said point witnessed by a 1" iron pipe found that bears South 25° 51' 12" East for a distance of 0.54' from said point; thence, Along a northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, South 85° 35' 53" East for a distance of 319.10' to an iron pin set, said point being the northwesterly corner of said northerly-most 0.2625 acre tract as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077, Tract 1; thence, Along the westerly line of said 0.2625 acre tract, South 04° 15' 07" West for a distance of 30.00' to the point of beginning, containing 0.206 acres of land, more or less, as determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The Kleingers Group in June, 2017. Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935." Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP." Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, ordinances or agreements of record. The foregoing legal descriptions may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the deeds. (B) In 1966, the Auditor of State, as Supervisor of School and Ministerial Lands pursuant to former section 501.01 of the Revised Code consented to the use of these lands by the predecessor to the Board of Education of the Eastland-Fairfield Career and Technical School District for school purposes, and the purpose of this legislation is to fulfill this intention. (C) Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate described in division (A) of this section shall be $1.00. (D) The conveyance includes improvements and chattels situated on the real estate, and is subject to all easements, covenants, conditions, leases, and restrictions of record; all legal highways and public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. (E) The Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. The net proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the General Revenue Fund. (F) Upon payment of the purchase price, the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services for recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Franklin County Recorder. (G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 4. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed in the name of the State transferring the following described real estate to the State of Ohio for the use and benefit of the Board of Education of the Groveport Madison Local School District ("Grantee"): Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, the City of Groveport and the City of Columbus, and, the Township of Madison, being all of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands East of the Scioto, as held in trust by the State of Ohio, Department of Administrative Services, and pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, section 501.01 of the Revised Code, less and excepting those properties as conveyed out of title as identified as Tracts 1 through 21 and being more particularly described as follows: Tract 1 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a found iron pin at the intersection of the centerline of Bixby Road with the centerline of Hendron Road, and at the southwest corner of said Section 16; Thence along the southerly line of said Section 16, and along the centerline of said Bixby Road, South 85 degrees 15 minutes 30 seconds East, a distance of 300.0 feet to a spike and the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THIS DESCRIPTION: Thence partly across said Section 16, and parallel to the westerly line of said Section 16, passing iron pins on line at 30.0 feet and 40.0 feet, North 4 degrees 08 minutes East, a total distance of 940.0 feet to an iron pin; Thence partly across said Section 16, and parallel to the southerly line of said Section 16 (center­line of said Bixby Road), South 85 degrees 15 minutes 30 seconds East, a distance of 500.0 feet to an iron pin; Thence partly across said Section 16, South 4 degrees 08 minutes West, passing iron pins on line at 900.0 feet and 910.0 feet, a total distance of 940.0 feet to a spike in the southerly line of said Section 16, and in the centerline of said Bixby Road; Thence along the southerly line of said Section 16, and along the centerline of said Bixby Road, North 85 degrees 15 minutes 30 seconds West, a distance of 500.0 feet to the place of beginning, containing 10.789 acres, subject to all legal highways and easements and restrictions and leases and agreements and utilities of record. Tract 2 Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, being part of the northwest quarter of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey of the Congress Lands and containing 44.557 acres of land, more or less, said 44.57 acres being particularly described as follows: Beginning, for reference, at a monument assembly at the point of intersection of the centerline of Williams Road and (OLD) Hamilton Road, said point being in the easterly line of the northwest quarter of Section 16; thence S 4° 24' 13" W, with the original centerline of said Hamilton Road, a distance of 1,069.07 feet to a point, said point being the northeasterly corner of a 40.00 acre tract of land used by all five of the school districts in the Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational School District, including the Groveport School District and the Canal Winchester School District in Madison Township and shown of record in "Journal Entry" Office of the Auditor of the State of Ohio; thence N 85° 35' 47" W, perpendicular to the preceding course, with the northerly tine of said 40.00 acre tract, a distance of 104.71 feet to the true point of beginning, said point located In the westerly right-of-way line of Relocated Hamilton Road, as the same is shown on State of Ohio, Department of Highway Plans (FRA-317 6.38) being 140 feet left of Station 146 + 40.27: Thence, from said true point of beginning, N 85° 35' 47" W, continuing with the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, a distance of 1,847.41 feet to a point: Thence, N 4° 24' 13" E, perpendicular to the preceding course, parallel to and 1,952.12 feet westerly from (as measured at right angles) the original center line of said Hamilton Road, a distance of 1,042.06 feet to a point, said point located 20 feet southerly of the centerline of Williams Road; Thence S 85° 48' 08" E, parallel with and 20.00 feet southerly from (as measured at right angles) the center­line of said Williams Road, a distance of 1,477.55 feet to a point, said point being 20.00 feet left of Station 4+75 as same is shown on Highway Plan FRA-33-(26.21-30.13); Thence, S 78° 57' 34" E, a distance of 125.90 feet to a point, said point located 35.00 feet left of Station 3 + 50 of said Plan; Thence, S 80° 41' 18" E, a distance of 220.25 feet to a point located in the westerly right-of-way line of said relocated Hamilton Road; Thence, S 30° 15' 51" E, with said westerly right-of-way line, a distance of 65.98 feet to a point, said point located 130.00 feet left of Station 156 + 00 (FRA-317 6.3R); Thence with said westerly right-of-way line by the following four courses and distances: (1) S 0° 02' 29" E, a distance of 250.80 feet to a point, said point located 110.00 feet left of Station 155 + 50; (2) S 4° 51' 58" W, a distance of 300.00 feet to a point, said point located 110.00 feet left of Station 150 + 50; (3) S 15° 50' 30" W, a distance of 152.97 feet to a point, said point located 140.00 feet left of Station 149 + 00; (4) S 4° 31' 53" W, a distance of 259.73 feet to the true point of beginning and containing 44.557 acres of land, more or less. Subject to all easements, right-of-way and restrictions, if any, of previous record. The above description was prepared by Hockaden-Lipes-Rousculp, Inc., Consulting Engineers, Columbus, Ohio, from information obtained by an actual survey of premises. Tract 3 Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Township of Madison and being part of the Southwest Quarter and part of the Northwest Quarter of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a railroad spike in the center line of Hamilton Road and in the easterly line of the Northwest Quarter of Section 16, said spike being S. 4° 28' W. a distance of 2169.07 feet from the northeasterly corner of the Northwesterly Quarter of Section 16; thence S. 4° 28' W. along the center line of Hamilton Road and passing an iron pin at the southeast corner of the Northwest Quarter of Section 16 at a distance of 527.43 feet, a distance of 1112.83 feet to a railroad spike; thence N. 85° 32' W. and parallel to the northerly line of the Southwest Quarter of Section 16 and 585.40 feet. Southerly therefrom, passing an iron pin on line at 35.00 feet and passing an iron pin at top of bank at a distance of 1689.17 feet a distance of 1905.00 feet to a point in the center line of Blacklick Creek; thence in a Northerly direction the following ten courses and distances along the center line of Blacklick Creek: (1) N. 00° 25' 37" W. a distance of 58.61 feet to a point; (2) Thence N. 27° 39' 55" E, a distance of 114.24 feet to a point; (3) Thence N. 17° 51' 33" E, a distance of 107.94 feet to a point; (4) Thence N. 7° 18' 03" E, a distance of 202.25 feet to a point; (5) Thence N. 25° 00' 33" W. a distance of 132.10 feet to a point; (6) Thence N. 26° 04' 26" W. a distance of 116.11 feet to a point; (7) Thence N. 56° 44' 59" W. a distance of 207.66 feet to a point; (8) Thence N. 28° 12' 59" E. a distance of 109.25 feet to a point; (9) Thence N. 22 12' 41" E. a distance of 105.00 feet to a point; (10) Thence N. 47° 57' 54" W. a distance of 209.00 ft. to a point; Said point being Northerly as measured at right angles to the southerly line of the Northwest Quarter of Section 16, a distance of 527.43 feet; thence S. 85° 32' E. and parallel to the southerly line of the Northwest Quarter of Section 16, passing an iron pin on line at 271.00 feet, and an iron pin on line at 2190.66 feet a distance of 2225.66 feet to the place of beginning, containing 49.998 acres; subject to all easements and restrictions shown of record; also subject to all legal highways. Tract 4 PARCEL NO. 1 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of the Madison School Section, Section 16, Twp. 11, R. 21, Buckingham's Survey, Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at the Southwesterly corner of Marketing Place (60' wide) as shown on dedicated plat in Plat Book 46, Page 93, said point being on the south line of a 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, an Ohio general partnership, by deed of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, said point being located a distance of 56.14 feet Easterly of the Southwest corner of said 44.557 acre tract. Thence, South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along the south line of said Marketing Place, and along a part of the south line of a 4.410 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, an Ohio general partnership, by deed of record in Deed Book 3393, Page 888,889, a distance of 330.52 feet to a point; Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, across said Madison School Section, along a line perpendicular to the last described line, a distance of 495.0 feet to a point; Thence North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, across said Madison School Section, along a line perpendicular to the last described line, and along a line parallel to the south line of the said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 311.19 feet to a point, said point being on the arc of a curve having a radius of 70.0 feet; Thence, Southerly and Westerly, along the arc of said curve having a radius of 70.0 feet, sub-delta angle of 180 degrees 0 minutes 00 seconds, along chord bearing North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, a distance of 140.00 feet to a point; Thence, North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, across said Madison School Section, along a line parallel to the south line of the said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 365.00 feet to a point; Thence, North 20 degrees 34 minutes 54 seconds West, across said Madison School Section, a distance of 275.82 feet to a point; Thence, South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along a line parallel to the south line of the said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 527.49 feet to a point, said point being on the arc of a curve to the right having a radius of 730 feet; Thence, Northernly, along the arc of said curve to the right having a radius of 730 feet, a delta angle of 24 degrees 30 minutes 00 seconds, a chord bearing North 20 degrees 19 minutes 29 seconds East, a distance of 217.90 feet to a point of reverse curvature; said chord having a sub-delta angle of 17 degrees 10 minutes 00 seconds; Thence, continuing northernly, along the arc of a curve to the left, having a radius of 670 feet, a delta angle of 3 degrees 17 minutes 27 seconds, a chord bearing North 27 degrees 15 minutes 46 seconds East, a distance of 38.47 feet to the place of beginning containing 7.3032 acres of land, subject however to all legal highways and easements and restrictions of record. PARCEL NO. 2 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of the Madison School Section, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey, Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the southwesterly corner of Marketing Place (60' wide) as shown on dedicated plat in Plat Book 46, Page 93, said corner being on the south line of a 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, an Ohio general partnership, by deed of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, said corner being located a distance of 56.14 feet easterly of the Southwest corner of the said 44.557 acre tract, said point also being on the arc of a curve to the right having a radius of 670 feet; Thence, southerly, along the west right-of-way of a proposed road 60 feet wide and along the arc of a curve to the right having a radius of 670 feet, a sub-delta angle of 3 degrees 17 minutes 27 seconds, a chord bearing South 27 degrees 15 minutes 46 seconds West, a distance of 38.47 feet to a point of reverse curvature of a said west line; Thence, southerly, continuing along the west right-of-way of said proposed road, along the arc of a curve to the left having a radius of 730.0 feet, a delta angle of 24 degrees 30 minutes 00 seconds, a long chord bearing South 16 degrees 39 minutes 29 seconds East, a distance of 309.78 feet to a point of tangency of said curve; Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, continuing along the west right-of-way line of said proposed road, along a tangent to the last described curve, a distance of 58.84 feet to a point on a curve: Thence, southerly, continuing along the said west right-of-way line, along the arc of a curve to the right having a radius of 70.0 feet, a delta angle of 44 degrees 24 minutes 55 seconds, a chord bearing South 26 degrees 36 minutes 56 seconds West, a distance of 52.91 feet to a point of reverse curvature; Thence, southerly, continuing along the said west right-of-way line, along the arc of a curve to the left having a radius of 70.0 feet, a sub-delta angle of 44 degrees 24 minutes 55 seconds, a chord bearing South 26 degrees 36 minutes 56 seconds West, a distance of 52.91 feet to a point, and the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THIS DESCRIPTION; Thence, southerly, continuing along the west right-of-way line, and along the arc of the said curve to the left having a radius of 70.0 feet, a sub-delta angle of 37 degrees 26 minutes 19 seconds, a chord bearing South 14 degrees 18 minutes 40 seconds East, a distance of 44.93 feet to a point; Thence, southwesterly, across said Madison School Section, along a line radial to the last described curve, S 56°58'10" West, a distance of 333.02 feet to a point; Thence, North 20 degrees 44 minutes 12 seconds West, across said Madison School Section, a distance of 270.65 feet to a point; Thence, South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along a line radial to the last described curve, a distance of 365.0 feet to the place of beginning, containing 1.1866 acres of land, subject however to all legal highways and easements and restrictions of record. Tract 5 Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and being a part of School Section 16 as reserved by Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 8, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning, for reference, at a monument found at Centerline Station 140+00.00 as shown on a plat entitled "CENTERLINE SURVEY PLAT, FRA-317-6.38", of record in Plat Book 41, Page 65, Franklin County Recorder's Office: Thence N 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds E, with said centerline, a distance of 390.28 feet to a point, said point being on the easterly extension of the centerline of Eastland School Avenue as shown on a plat entitled DEDICATION OF WILLIAMS ROAD, MARKETING PLACE, DIRECTORS BOULEVARD, INVESTORS AVENUE, AND EASTLAND SCHOOL AVENUE, of record in Plat Book 46, Page 93; Thence S 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E, with said easterly extension of the centerline of Eastland School Avenue, a distance of 140.00 feet to an iron pin in the easterly line of a 3.213 acre tract described in a deed to the Ohio Department of Highways (Parcel 22-WD-1), of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, said point being the TRUE PLACE OF BEGINNING; Thence S 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E, continuing with said easterly extension of said centerline, a distance of 1260.00 feet to an iron pin; Thence S 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds W, a distance of 1586.08 feet to an iron pin; Thence S 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E, a distance of 320.00 feet to an iron pin; Thence S 4 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds W, a distance of 522.00 feet to an iron pin; Thence N 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds W, a distance of 1572.72 feet to an iron pin in the easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract; Thence N 4 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds E, with the easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract, passing an iron pin at a distance of 522.00 feet, a total distance of 737.70 feet to an iron pin at an angle point therein, said point being located S 85 degrees 35 minutes 26 seconds E (along the angular bisector), a distance of 150.00 feet from a monument found at Station 130+19.90 in said centerline; Thence N 3 degrees 57 minutes 45 seconds E, continuing with the easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract, a distance of 979.81 feet to an iron pin at an angle point therein, said point being located S 85 degrees 27 minutes 36 seconds E (along the angular bisector), a distance of 140.00 feet from a monument found at Station 140+00.00; Thence N 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds E, continuing with the easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract, a distance of 390.60 feet to THE TRUE PLACE OF BEGINNING, containing 64.627 acres, more or less, subject to all easements restrictions, and rights-of-way of previous record. Tract 6 Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and being a part of School Section 16 as reserved by Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of a 64.627 acre tract described in a deed from the State of Ohio to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, recorded February 8, 1978, and bearing instrument No. 17, Page 134, School Lands, said iron pin being in the easterly line of a 3.213 acre tract described in a deed to the Ohio Department of Highways (Parcel 22-WD-1), of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395; Thence N 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds E, with the easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract, a distance of 9.41 feet to an angle point therein; Thence N 12 degrees 09 minutes 59 seconds W, continuing with said easterly line, a distance of 16.26 feet to a point; Thence, through said School Lands, the following four courses: (1) S 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E (parallel to and 25.00 feet northerly from the northerly line of said 64.627 acre tract), a distance of 45.70 feet to a point; (2) N 64 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds E, a distance of 55.00 feet to a point; (3) S 55 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds E, a distance of 65.00 feet to a point; (4) S 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds W, a distance of 20.00 feet to a point in the northerly line of said 64.627 acre tract. Thence N 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds W, with said northerly line, a distance of 145.00 feet to the place of beginning, containing 0.114 acres, more or less. This description was prepared by Hockaden and Associates, Inc., Consulting Engineers, Columbus, Ohio, a plat of said 0.144 acre tract being attached hereto and made a part hereof. Tract 7 Situated in the State of Ohio, Franklin County, Village of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and being a part of School Section 16 as reserved by act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more fully described as follows: Beginning at the northeast corner of a 64.627 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, an Ohio general partnership, and recorded February 8, 1978, and bearing instrument No. 17, Page 134, School Lands; Thence with the north line of said 64.627 acre tract extended easterly, South 85°35'31" East a distance of 170.00 feet; Thence South 00°15'37" East a distance of 232.69 feet; Thence South 29°14'06" East a distance of 158.03 feet; Thence South 02°02'33" West a distance of 1190.81 feet; Thence South 20°53'00" East a distance of 610.84 feet; Thence North 86°08'06" West a distance of 265.38 feet; Thence with the east line of said 64.627 acre tract North 04° 16' 18" East a distance of 522.00 feet; Thence continuing with said east line North 85°35'31" West a distance of 320.00 feet; Thence continuing with said east line North 04°24' 29" East a distance of 1586.08 feet to the point of beginning, containing 11.849 acres more or less. Tract 8 Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport in the Madison School Section, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey, Congress Lands and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at an iron pipe in the westerly Cul-de-sac right-of-way line of Marketing Place (said Marketing Place was dedicated in Plat Book 51, Page 119, Recorder's Office, Franklin County) and at the southeasterly corner of the Metal Art Investment Company 1.1866 acre tract (Parcel I) of record in Deed Book 3642, Page 793, said Recorder's Office; Thence, along the line of said Marketing Place and along the arc of a curve to the left having a radius of 70.00 feet, a sub-delta angle of 84 degrees 28 minutes 10 seconds, a tangent distance of 63.55 feet and a chord bearing and distance of South 75 degrees 15 minutes 58 seconds East, 94.10 feet to an iron pipe; Thence, across said Madison School Section, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, 355.58 feet to an iron pipe; Thence, continue across said Madison School Section, North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, 165.00 feet to an iron pipe at the southeasterly corner of the Metal Art Investment Company, 1.073 acre tract 9 parcel II) of record in Deed Book 3642, Page 793, said Recorder's Office; Thence, along the easterly line of said 1.073 acre tract, North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, 317.00 feet to an iron pipe at the northeasterly corner of said 1.073 acre tract and in the southeasterly line of said 1.1866 acre tract; Thence, along the southeasterly line of said 1.1866 acre tract, North 56 degrees 58 minutes 10 seconds East, 91.21 feet to the place of beginning, containing 1.320 acres, subject, however, to all legal highways, easements, restrictions, agreements and leases of record and of records in the respective utility offices. The above survey was made by Albert J. Myers, Registered Surveyor No. 6579. Tract 9 Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and being a part of the School Section 16 as reserved by Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1795, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning, for reference, at the northwesterly corner of a 64.627 acre tract of land described in a deed to Columbus and Southern Ohio Electric Company, to Deed Book 3636, Page 229, (all references to Deed Books in this description are of record in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio), said corner being in the easterly line of a 3.213 acre tract of land described in a deed to the Ohio Department of Highways (Parcel 22-WD-1), of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, thence S 85°35'31" E, with the northerly line of said 64.627 acre tract, a distance of 181.64 feet to the TRUE PLACE OF BEGINNING; Thence S 85°35'31" E, continuing with said northerly line, a distance of 182.11 feet to a point; Thence N 79°54'08" W, a distance of 187.48 feet to a point; Thence S 9°03'45" E, with the easterly right-of-way of proposed HIGGINS BOULEVARD, a distance of 19.12 feet to the TRUE PLACE OF BEGINNING, and containing 0.0395 acres of land, more or less. This description was prepared by Hockaden and Associates, Inc., Consulting Engineers, Columbus, Ohio. Cloyd E. Evers, Registered Surveyor No. 6579. Tract 10 Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and being a part of School Section 16 as reserved by Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning, for reference at an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of a 64.627 acre tract described in a deed to COLUMBUS & SOUTHERN OHIO ELECTRIC COMPANY, of record in Deed Book 3636, Page 229, (all references to Deed Books in this description are of record in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio) said iron pin being in the easterly line of a 3.213 acre tract described in a deed to The Ohio Department of Highways (Parcel 22-WD-1), of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, thence N 4°31'58" E, with the easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract, a distance of 9.41 feet to an angle point; Thence N 12°09'59" W, continuing with said easterly line, a distance of 16.26 feet to the northwesterly corner of a 0.114 acre tract of land described in a deed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs, of record in Deed Book 3636, page 225, said corner being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING; Thence N 12°09'59" W, continuing with said easterly line, a distance of 8.45 feet to a point; Thence, through said School Lands, the following three courses: (1) N 74°40'07" E, a distance of 116.24 feet to a point; (2) S 55°35'31" E, a distance of 85.10 feet to a point; (3) S 9°03'45" E, a distance of 30.66 feet to a point in the northerly line of said 64.627 acre tract. Thence N 85°35'31" W, with said northerly line, a distance of 38.22 feet to the southeasterly corner of said 0.114 acre tract; Thence, with the easterly and northerly lines of said 0.114 acre tract, the following four courses: (1) N 4°24'29" E, a distance of 20.00 feet to a point; (2) N 55°35'31" W, a distance of 65.00 feet to a point; (3) S 64°24'29" W, a distance of 55.00 feet to a point; (4) N 85°35'31" W, a distance of 45.70 feet to the point of beginning, containing 0.104 acres of land, more or less. This description was prepared by Hockaden and Associates, Inc., Consulting Engineers, Columbus, Ohio. Cloyd E. Evers, Registered Surveyor No. 6579. Tract 11 PARCEL #2 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of Madison School Section, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey of Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a point on the southerly right-of-way line of Williams Road (40 feet wide) at the northwesterly corner of an original 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs shown of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, and at the northwesterly corner of Williams Road as dedicated in Plat Book 46, Page 93, said point being on the City of Columbus, and Village of Groveport Corporation line; Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along the westerly line of said Williams Road as dedicated in Plat Book 46, Page 93, and along the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 20.00 feet to a point and THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THIS DESCRIPTION: Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 456.33 feet to a point; Thence, North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along a line parallel with the centerline of said Williams Road, a distance of 388.48 feet to a point; Thence, North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, along a line parallel with the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 456.33 feet to a point; Thence, South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along a line parallel with and 40.00 feet southerly of and measured at right angles to the centerline of said Williams Road, a distance of 388.48 feet to the place of beginning, containing 4.0697 acres, subject however, to all highways and easements of record and of records, easements and restrictions in the respective utility offices. PARCEL #2-A Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of Madison School Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey of Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a point on the southerly right-of-way line of Williams Road (40 feet wide) at the northwesterly corner of an original 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs shown of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, and at the northwesterly corner of Williams Road as dedicated in Plat Booke 46, Page 93, said point being on the City of Columbus, and Village of Groveport Corporation line; Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along the westerly line of said Williams Road as dedicated in Plat Book 46, Page 93, a distance of 20.00 feet to a point at the southwesterly corner of Williams Road dedicated in Plat Book 46, Page 93; Thence, North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along a line parallel with and 40.00 feet southerly of measured at right angles to the centerline of said Williams Road, a distance of 388.48 feet to a point; Thence, North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, along a line parallel with the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 20.00 feet to a point on the southerly right-of-way line of said Williams Road; Thence, South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along the southerly right-of-way line of said Williams Road, and along a line parallel with and 20.00 feet southerly of and measured at right angles to the centerline of said Williams Road, a distance of 388.48 feet to the place of beginning, containing 0.1784 acres, subject however, to all highways and easements of record and of records, easements and restrictions in the respective utility offices. PARCEL 02-B Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of Madison School Section, Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Buckingham's Survey of Congress Lands, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a point on the Southerly right-of-way line of Williams Road (40 feet wide) at the northwesterly corner of an original 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs shown of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174, and at the northwesterly corner of Williams Road as dedicated in Plat Book 46, Page 93, said point being on the City of Columbus and Village of Groveport Corporation line; Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along the westerly line of said Williams Road as dedicated in Plat Book 46, Page 93, and along the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 476.33 feet to a point, and THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THIS DESCRIPTION; Thence, South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along the westerly line of said 44.57 acres tract, a distance of 50.00 feet to a point; Thence, North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along a line parallel with the centerline of said Williams Road, a distance of 408.48 feet to a point; Thence, North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, along a line parallel with the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 50.00 feet to a point; Thence, South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along a line parallel with the centerline of said Williams Road, a distance of 408.48 feet to the place of beginning, containing 0.4689 acres, subject however, to all highways and easements of record and of records, easements and restrictions in the respective utility offices. The description for Parcel No. 2, 2-A and 2-B were prepared by Albert H. Andrews, Registered Surveyor No. 5699. Tract 12 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School Section 16 as reserved by Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a point on the easterly limited access right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (FRA-317-6.38), and on the westerly right-of-way line of Higgins Boulevard as dedicated in Plat Book 58, Page 63, said point being at the northwesterly corner of an original 64.627 acre tract conveyed to Columbus and Southern Ohio Electric Company shown of record in Deed Book 3636, Page 229; Thence North 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds East, along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said Hamilton Road and along the westerly right-of-way line of said Higgins Boulevard, a distance of 9.41 feet to an angle point in said line; Thence North 12 degrees 09 minutes 59 seconds West continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said Hamilton Road and along the westerly right-of-way line of said Higgins Boulevard, a distance of 24.72 feet to an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of said Higgins Boulevard, and also the northwesterly corner of a 0.104 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs shown of record in official Record 721, Page A-12, and the true point beginning of the description: Thence North 12 degrees 09 minutes 59 seconds West, continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said Hamilton Road, distance of 79.68 feet to an iron pin at the angle point in said line; Thence North 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds East, continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said Hamilton Road, a distance of 500.13 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence North 1 degree 05 minutes 57 seconds East, continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said Hamilton Road, a distance of 500.90 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence North 4 degrees 31 minutes 58 seconds East, continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said Hamilton Road, a distance of 209.02 feet to an iron pin at the intersection of the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said Hamilton Road, with the northerly line of Section 16, (southerly line of Section 9), said point being at the southwesterly corner of a 3.781 acre tract conveyed to James E. Gillain shown of record in Deed Book 3172, Page 248; Thence South 85 degrees 22 minutes 52 seconds East, along the northerly line of Section 16, and along the southerly line of said 3.781 acre tract (southerly line of Section 9), a distance of 872.84 feet to an iron pin on the southwesterly limited access right-of-way line of U.S. 33 (FRA-33-26.21-30.13) at the southeasterly corner of said 3.781 acre tract, said point being at the intersection of the northerly line of Section 16 (southerly line of Section 9), with the southwesterly limited access right-of-way line of said U.S. 33; Thence South 49 degrees 26 minutes 03 seconds East, along the southwesterly limited access right-of-way line of said U.S. 33, a distance of 68.25 feet to a concrete monument at an angle point in said line; Thence South 50 degrees 14 minutes 27 seconds East, continuing along the southwesterly limited access right-of-way line of said U.S. 33, a distance of 710.07 feet to a concrete monument at an angle point in said line; Thence South 49 degrees 26 minutes 03 seconds East, continuing along the southwesterly limited access right-of-way line of said U.S. 33, a distance of 100.00 feet to a concrete monument at an angle point in said line; Thence South 46 degrees 34 minutes 18 seconds Eat, continuing along the southwesterly limited access right-of-way line of said U.S. 33, a distance of 200.25 feet to a concrete monument at an angle point in said line; Thence South 52 degrees 17 minutes 48 seconds East, continuing along the southwesterly limited access right-of-way line of said U.S. 33, a distance of 159.97 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence South 72 degrees 03 minutes 23 seconds West, a distance of 458.50 feet to an iron pin; Thence South 0 degrees 15 minutes 37 seconds East, a distance of 418.51 feet to an iron pin at the northeasterly corner of an 11.849 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs shown of record in Deed Book 3673, Page 519; Thence North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, along the northerly line of said 11.849 acre tract, and along the northerly line of said 64.627 acre tract, a distance of 1246.78 feet to a cross in concrete on the easterly right-of-way line of said Higgins Boulevard, said point being at the southeasterly corner of said 0.104 acre tract; Thence North 9 degrees 03 minutes 45 seconds West, along the easterly right-of-way line of said Higgins Boulevard and along said line produced northerly, and along the easterly line of said 0.104 acre tract, a distance of 30.66 feet to an iron pin at the northeasterly corner of said 0.104 acre tract; Thence North 55 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, along the northerly right-of-way line of said Higgins Boulevard produced easterly, and along the northerly right-of-way line of Higgins Boulevard, and along the northerly line of said 0.104 acre tract, a distance of 85.10 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in the northerly line of said 0.104 acre tract, and at a corner of said Higgins Boulevard; Thence South 74 degrees 40 minutes 07 seconds West, leaving the northerly right-of way line of said Higgins Boulevard, and along the northerly line of said 0.104 acre tract, a distance of 116.24 feet to the place of beginning, containing 42.849 acres, subject however to all highways and easements of record and of records, easements, and restrictions in the respective utility office. The above description was prepared by Albert H. Andrews, Registered Surveyor No. 5699. Tract 13 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at an iron pin on the westerly right-of-way line of Marketing Place (60 feet wide), said point being at the northwesterly corner of Marketing Place (60 feet wide) as dedicated in Plat Book 51, Page 119, and the southwesterly corner of Marketing Place (60 feet wide) as dedicated in Plat Book 46, Page 93, said point being on the southerly line of an original 44.557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs shown of record in Deed Booke 3327, Page 174; Thence in a southerly direction, along the westerly right-of-way line of said Marketing Place, and along the arc of a curve to the right having a radius of 670.00 feet, a subdelta angle of 3 degrees 17 minutes 27 seconds, a tangent of 19.24 feet, an arc of 38.48 feet, a long chord bearing and distance of South 27 degrees 15 minutes 46 seconds West, 38.47 feet to an iron pin at a point of Reverse Curvature; Thence in a southerly direction continuing along the westerly right-of-way line of said Marketing Place, and along the arc of a curve to the left having a radius of 730.00 feet, a subdelta angle of 17 degrees 10 minutes, a tangent of 110.18 feet, an arc of 218.72 feet, along chord bearing and distance of South 20 degrees 19 minutes 29 seconds West, 217.90 feet to an iron pin at the northeasterly corner of a 2.618 acre tract conveyed to Westinghouse Electric Corporation shown of record in Deed Book 3585, Page 445; Thence North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, along the northerly line of said 2.618 acre tract, a distance of 527.49 feet to an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of said 2.618 acre tract; Thence North 20 degrees 34 minutes 54 seconds West, along the westerly line of said 2.618 acre tract produced northwesterly, a distance of 393.01 feet to an iron pin; Thence South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along a line parallel with the northerly line of said 2.618 acre tract, a distance of 712.08 feet to an iron pin on the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract; Thence South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 111.22 feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of said 44.557 acre tract; Thence South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along the southerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 56.14 feet to the place of beginning, containing 5.211 acres, subject however to all highways and easements of record, and of records, easements, and restrictions in the respective utility offices. The above description was prepared by Albert H. Andrews Registered Surveyor No. 5699. Tract 14 PARCEL 1 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at an iron pin on the easterly right-of-way line of South Hamilton Road (State Route 317) (FRA-317-6.38), and on the easterly line of a 3.213 acre tract (Parcel 22-WD-1) conveyed to the State of Ohio shown of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, said point being at the southwesterly corner of an original 64.627 acre tract conveyed to the Columbus and Southern Ohio Electric Company shown of record in Deed Book 3636, Page 229, and the southwesterly corner of a 3.00 acre tract conveyed to Madison Township Trustees shown of record in Official Record 833, Page C-17, said point being South 4 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds West, along the easterly right-of-way line of South Hamilton Road (Easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract) (westerly line of said 3.00 acre tract), a distance of 462.00 feet from the intersection of the easterly right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road, with the southerly right-of-way line of Firehouse Lane (100 feet wide), as dedicated in Plat Book 58, Page 13; Thence South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, and along the southerly line of said 3.00 acre tract, and along the southerly line of Madison Lane (60 feet wide) dedicated in Plat Book 58, Page 13, and along the southerly line of a 5.037 acre tract conveyed to The 614 Company shown of record in Deed Book 3760, Page 586, and along the southerly line of 64.627 acre tract, passing iron pins on line at 222.84 feet and 282.84 feet, a total distance of 1572.72 feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of said 64.627 acre tract, and the southwesterly corner of an 11.849 acre tract conveyed to Donald E. Ball, Jr. shown of record in Official Record 1967, Page F-04; Thence South 86 degrees 08 minutes 06 seconds East, along the southerly line of said 11.849 acre tract, a distance of 265.38 feet to an iron pin at the southeasterly corner of said 11.849 acre tract; Thence South 20 degrees 53 minutes East, a distance of 220.68 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence South 25 degrees 35 minutes 47 seconds West, a distance of 406.99 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence South 70 degrees 08 minutes 18 seconds West, a distance of 330.95 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence South 17 degrees 11 minutes 44 seconds West, a distance of 651.86 Feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence North 89 degrees 18 minutes 31 seconds West, a distance of 392.44 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence South 8 degrees 35 minutes 26 seconds West, a distance of 357.44 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence North 81 degrees 35 minutes 15 seconds West, a distance of 277.26 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence North 34 degrees 03 minutes 07 seconds West, a distance of 300.05 feet to an iron pin at angle point in said line; Thence North 55 degrees 05 minutes 06 seconds West, a distance of 651.84 feet to an iron pin on the easterly Limited Access right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road, and on the easterly line of a 28.207 acre tract (Parcel 22-WL) conveyed to the State of Ohio shown of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395; Thence North 27 degrees 26 minutes 40 seconds East, along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road (easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract), a distance of 42.52 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence North 7 degrees 18 minutes 52 seconds East, continuing along the easterly limited access right-of- way lines of said South Hamilton Road (easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract) a distance of 114.08 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence North 9 degrees 15 minutes 26 seconds East, continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road (easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract), a distance of 204.66 feet to an iron pin at the southeasterly corner of said 3.213 acre tract; Thence South 82 degrees 43 minutes 42 seconds East, along the right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road (Southerly line of said 3.213 acre trat), a distance of 50.00 feet to an iron pin at the Southeasterly corner of said 3.213 acre tract; Thence North 6 degrees 00 minutes 31 seconds East, along the easterly right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road (easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract), a distance of 508.96 feet to an iron pin at an angle point in the said line; Thence North 4 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds East, continuing along the easterly right-of-way line of said South Hamilton Road (easterly line of said 3.213 acre tract), a distance of 281.67 feet to the place of beginning, containing 54.788 acres, subject to all highways and easements of record, and of records, easements, and restrictions in the respective utility offices, also subject to the following described easement 30 feet wide to be used for Ingress and Egress for farm equipment, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a point on the easterly limited access right-of-way of South Hamilton Road (State Route 317) (FRA-317-6.38), and on the easterly line of a 28.207 acre tract (Parcel 22-WL) shown of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, said point being at the southwesterly corner of a 3.213 acre tract (Parcel 22-WD-1) conveyed to the State of Ohio shown of record in Deed Book 3241, Page 395, said point being 90.00 feet right of centerline Station 114 + 98.52 as shows on the plans of said South Hamilton Road; Thence south nine degrees fifteen minutes twenty-six seconds West (S-9°-15'-26"-W), along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, the easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract, a distance of 50 feet to a point, and the true point of beginning of this description. Thence south eighty degrees forty-four minutes thirty four seconds east (S-80°-44'-34"E) a distance of 30 feet to a point; Thence south nine degrees fifteen minutes twenty-six seconds West (S-9°-15'-26"W), along a line parallel with and 30 feet easterly as measured at right angles to the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, a distance of one hundred fifty-four and fourteen hundredths (154.14) feet; Thence south seven degrees eighteen minutes fifty-two seconds West (S-7°-18-52"W), along a line parallel with and 30 feet easterly as measured at right angles to the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, a distance of one hundred eighteen and ninety-two hundredths (118.92) feet to a point; Thence south twenty-seven degrees twenty-six minutes forty Seconds west (S-27°-26'-40"-W) along a line parallel with and 30 feet easterly as measures at angle to the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, a distance of fifty-one and seventy-three hundredths (51.73) feet to a point; Thence north fifty-five degrees five minutes six seconds west (N-55°-05'-06"-W), a distance of thirty and twenty-six hundredths (30.26) feet to an iron pin on the easterly limited access right-of-way Line of said south Hamilton Road, the easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract; Thence north twenty-seven degrees twenty-six minutes forty seconds East (N-27°-26'-40"E), along the easterly limited access Right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, the easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract a distance of forty-two and fifty-two hundredths (42.52) feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence north seven degrees eighteen minutes fifty-two seconds East (N-7°-18'-52"E), continuing along the easterly limited access right-of- way line of said south Hamilton Road, the easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract, a distance of one hundred fourteen and eight hundredths (114.08) feet to an iron pin at an angle point in said line; Thence north nine degrees fifteen minutes twenty-six seconds east (N-9°-15'-26"-E), continuing along the easterly limited access right-of-way line of said south Hamilton Road, the easterly line of said 28.207 acre tract, a distance of one hundred fifty-four and sixty-six hundredths (154.66) feet to the place of beginning containing 0.219 acres, subject however to all highways and easements of record and of records, easements, and restrictions in the respective utility offices. Point of access to the above described easement is right of highway Station 114+50 as shown on the plans of said Hamilton Road, and also shown on the records of Deed Book 3421, Page 395, (The point of access to the Subject 54.788 acre tract is at highway Station 114+50 as shown on the right-of-way plans of south Hamilton Road and State Route 317). PARCEL 2 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at an iron pin found on the centerline of Williams Road, at the northwesterly corner of Section 16 said point being at the northeasterly corner of 0.617 acre tract conveyed to Stanley F, and Dorothy E. Carter shown of record in Deed Book 3266,,Page 693 (northeasterly corner of Section 17), said point being at the intersection of the centerline of said Williams Road, with the centerline of Hendron Road, dedicated in Plat Book 48, Page 36; Thence South 4 degrees 08 minutes 43 seconds West, along the westerly line of Section 16, (easterly line of Section 17) and along the easterly line of said 0.617 acre tract, a distance of 40.00 feet to an iron pin, and the true point of beginning of this description; Thence South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along a line parallel with, and 40.00 feet southerly of, measured at right angles to the centerline of said Williams Road (northerly line of Section 16), a distance of 409.82 feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of a 0.1784 acre tract conveyed to the Village of Groveport shown of record in Official Record 1067, PageE-01, and the northwesterly corner of 4.0697 acre tract (Parcel #2) conveyed to the Barnes Group, Inc. shown of record in Official Record 1067, Page 6-04; Thence South, 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along the westerly line of said 4.0697 acre tract, a distance of 456.33 feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of said 4.0697 acre tract, and in the northerly line of a 0.4689 acre tract (Parcel 2B) conveyed to Ball and Galloway shown of record is Official Record 1067, Page D-17; Thence North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along the northerly line of said 0.4689 acre tract, a distance of 20.00 feet to an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of said 0.4689 acre tract; Thence South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along the westerly line of said 0.4689 acre tract, a distance of 50.00 feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of said 0.4689 acre tract; Thence South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along the southerly line of said 0.4689 acre tract, a distance of 408.48 feet to an iron pin at the southeasterly corner of said 0.4689 acre tract, and on the westerly line of an original 44,557 acre tract conveyed to Ball, Ball, Galloway and Jacobs shown of record in Deed Book 3327, Page 174; Thence South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, long the westerly line of said 44.557 acre tract, a distance of 404.36 feet to an iron pin at the northeasterly corner of a 5.211 acre tract conveyed to Ball and Galloway shown of record in Official Record 2103, Page J-16; Thence North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, the northerly line of said 5.211acre tract, a distance of 712.08 feet to an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of said 5.211 acre tract; Thence North 20 degrees 34 minutes 54 seconds West, along the westerly line of said5.211 acre tract produced northwesterly a distance of 196.13 feet to an iron pin on the westerly line of Section 16, (easterly line of Section 17) and on the easterly line of a 12.979 acre tract conveyed to Emil and Giseka Heurich shown of record in Deed Book 1240, Page 61; Thence North 4 degrees 08 minutes 43 seconds East, along the westerly line of Section 16, (easterly line of Section 17) and along the easterly line of said 12.979 acre tract, and along the easterly line of said 0.617 acre tract, a distance of 730.00 feet to the place of beginning, containing 11.9133 acres, subject however to all highways and easements of record, and of records, easements, and restrictions in the respective utility offices. PARCEL 3 Proposed right-of-way limits of Williams Road. Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at an iron pin found on the centerline of Williams Road, at the northwesterly corner of Section 16, said point being at the northeasterly corner of a 0.617 acre tract conveyed to Stanley F. and Dorothy E. Carter shown of record in Deed Book 3266, Page 693 (northeasterly corner of Section 17), said point being at the intersection of the centerline of said Williams Road, with the centerline of said Williams Road, with the centerline of Hendron Road dedicated in Plat Book 48, Page 36; Thence South 4 degrees 08 minutes 43 seconds West, along the westerly line of Section 16, and along the easterly line of said 0.617 acre tract (easterly line of Section 17), a distance of 20.00 feet to an iron pin on the southerly right-of-way of said Williams Road, and the true point of beginning of this description; Thence South 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds East, along the southerly right-of-way line of said Williams Road, and along the corporation line, and along a line parallel with and 20.00 feet southerly of, measured at right angles to the centerline of said Williams Road (Northerly line of Section 16), a distance of 409.91 feet to an iron pin at the northwesterly corner of a 0.1784 acre tract conveyed to the Village of Groveport shown of record in Official Records 1067, Page E-01; Thence South 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, along the westerly line of said 0.1784 acre tract, a distance of 20.00 feet to an iron pin at the southwesterly corner of said 0.1784 acre tract, and northwesterly corner of a 4.0697 acre tract (Parcel #2) conveyed to the Barnes Group, Inc. shown of record in Official Record 1067, Page C-04; Thence North 85 degrees 48 minutes 08 seconds West, along a line parallel with and 40.00 feet southerly of measured at right angles to the centerline of said Willians Road (northly line of Section 16), a distance of 409.82 feet to an iron pin on the westerly line of Section 16, and on the easterly line of said 0.617 acre tract (easterly line of Section 17); Thence North 4 degrees 08 minutes 43 seconds East, along the westerly line of Section 16, and along the easterly line of said 0.617 acre tract (easterly line of Section 17), a distance of 20.00 feet to the place of the beginning, containing 0.1882 acres, subject however to all highways and easements of record, and of records, easements and restrictions in the respective utility offices. The above descriptions were prepared by Albert H. Andrews, Registered Surveyor No. 5699. Tract 15 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, and being a part of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and also being known as School Section 16, as reserved by the Act of Congress in the Land Act of May 18, 1796, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a point in the southeast corner of the W.C.N. Enterprises 4.647 acre tract recorded in Official Record 2068, Pg. F-19 and proceeding in a southerly line S. 4° 24' 29" W., 30 feet to a point; Thence west along a line N. 85° 35' 31" W. for a distance of 381.19 feet to a point in the westerly boundary; Thence north along a line S. 4° 24' 29" W. 30 feet to an iron pin; Thence east along a line N. 85° 35' 31" W. 381.19 feet to the point of beginning, containing.2625 acres more or less. The above description was prepared by Albert Myers, Registered Surveyor No. 6579. Tract 16 Being situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Village of Groveport, Part of Section 16, Township 11, Range 21, Congress Lands, and being part of the 49.998 acre tract conveyed to Madison Local School District recorded in Deed Book 3336, Page 482, (Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio), and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a point in the north line of the said 49.998 acre tract, said point being the intersection of said line with the east line, (produced southernly), of the 4.647 acre tract conveyed to W.C.N. Enterprises Limited, recorded in Official Records Volume 2068, F-19, said point being located 30.0 feet south of the southeast corner of the said 4.647 acre tract; said point also being in a southerly line of the 40 acre tract to Easten Franklin County Joint Vocational School District (Volume 17, Page 48, School Land Records, State Auditor's Office); Thence South 4° degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds West, across the said 49.998 acre tract, along the east line (produced southerly) of the said 4.647 acre tract, a distance of 0.0 feet to a point; Thence, North 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds West, across the said 49.998 acre tract, along a line parallel with the north line of said tract and parallel with the south line of the said 4.647 acre tract, a distance of 381.19 feet to a point, said point being the intersection of said line with a west line (produced southerly) of the said 4.647 acre tract; Thence, North 4 degrees 24 minutes 29 seconds East, across the said 49.998 acre tract and along a west line of the said 4.647 acre tract (produced southerly), a distance of 30.0 feet to a point in the north line of the said 49.998 acre tract (south line of the said 40.0 acre tract); Thence, South 85 degrees 35 minutes 31 seconds East, along part of the north line of said 49.998 acre tract, along a line parallel with and 30.0 feet south of the south line of the said 4.647 acre tract, a distance of 381.19 feet to the place of the beginning containing 0.2625 acres of land, subject however to all legal highways and easements and restrictions of record. The above was prepared from records only. The basis of bearing is the south line of said 4.647 acre tract. MYERS SURVEYING COMPANY, INC. Albert J. Myers, P. S. 6579 Tract 17 Situated in Madison Township, Franklin County, Ohio, and being part of the Northwest Corner of Section 16, Town 11N, Range 21W, of Congress Lands, being that section set aside by Act of Congress dated March 3, 1803, for schools and in Trust to the State of Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a stone found at the northeast corner of said section, thence South 00 degrees 01 minute 00 seconds East along the east line of said section 943.21 feet to a pin set in the north line of Route 33, thence, the following courses along the north line of said Route: North 54 degrees 06 minutes 00 seconds West 92.46 feet to a point, North 52 degrees 40 minutes 04 seconds West 170.05 feet to a point, North 53 degrees 42 minutes 52 seconds West 55.00 feet to a point, North 52 degrees 20 minutes 21 seconds West 175.08 feet to a point, North 52 degrees 57 minutes 15 seconds West 500.10 feet to a point, North 56 degrees 57 minutes 55 seconds West 200.25 feet to a point, North 59 degrees 48 minutes 38 seconds West 100.50 feet to a point, North 54 degrees 06 minutes 00 seconds West 314.29 feet to a pin set in the north line of said section at its intersection with said north line of Route 33, thence, North 89 degrees 57 minutes 13 seconds East along the north line of said section 1301.27 feet to the place of beginning. Containing 13.792 acres of land, and being all that part of section 16 that line north of the north line of Route 33. Excepting therefrom, all that land which lies south and east of the west bank of Blacklick Creek being 2.268 Acres of land. And being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a pin at the southernmost corner of the above-described parcel at the intersection of the north line of Route 33 and the east line of section 16: Thence, along said north line of Route 33 the following courses: North 54 degrees 06 minutes 00 seconds West 92.46 feet to a point, North 52 degrees 40 minutes 04 seconds West 170.05 feet to a point, North 53 degrees 42 minutes 52 seconds West 55.00 feet to a point, North 52 degrees 20 minutes 21 seconds West 175.00 feet to a point. Thence, leaving said line North 82 degrees 39 minutes 36 seconds East across said parcel 442.31 feet to a point in the east line of said section. Thence, South 00 degrees 01 minute 00 seconds East along said section line 500.00 feet to the place of beginning. Allowing 11.524 acres of land to be transferred herewith. This description is based on a field survey done by Ahlers Moe and Associate, Inc. in May of 1988, which bearings are based on the Centerline of Route 33 being North 54 degrees 06 minutes 00 seconds West. Tract 18 Situated in Madison Township, Franklin County, Ohio, and being part of Section 16, Town 11N, Range 21W, of Congress Lands, being that section set aside by Act of Congress dated March 3, 1803 for schools and in Trust to the State of Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at an iron pin found at a Southwesterly corner of Hamilton/33 Industrial Park of record in Plat Book 70, Page 62/63 (all deed and plat reference refer to the records of the Recorder's Office Franklin County, Ohio) said pin also being in the Easterly right-of-way of Hamilton Road, S.R. 317; Thence South 55 degrees 05 minutes 06 seconds East with a Southerly line of said Hamilton/33 Industrial Park a distance of 415.36 to an iron pin found at the Southwesterly corner of Lot #8 of said Hamilton/33 Industrial Park. Thence South 34 degrees 54 minutes 54 seconds West a distance of 58.02 feet to an iron pin set; Thence North 64 degrees 01 minute 43 seconds West a distance of 101.50 feet to an iron pin set at an angle point; Thence North 69 degrees 59 minutes 33 seconds West a distance of 254.42 feet to a pin set in said Easterly right-of-way. Thence North 08 degrees 24 minutes 35 seconds East with said easterly right-of-way distance of 155.57 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING and containing 0.863 acres of land more or less. Subject to all, restrictions, easements and right-of-way of record. This description was prepared by Civil Engineering Associate's, Inc., Columbus, Ohio, based on a field survey of the premises in June, 1989 by Jeffrey A. Miller, P.S. # 7211. The basis of bearings used herein is in the same bearing system as Hamilton/33 Industrial Park, a plat of this survey is attached hereto and made a part thereof. Tract 19 Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, R.C. Section 501.01; also being a portion of school lands as described in a Journal Entry by the Office of the Auditor of the State of Ohio, Volume 17 Page 48 (dated 7/14/1966), allocating a 40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational School District, now known as The Eastland-Fairfield Career & Technical Schools; being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 317; right-of-way varies) and the southerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in "Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46 Page 93; said point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, as recorded in Deed Book 3241 Page 395 Parcel 22-WL, said point being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning point running thence the following four courses along the westerly right-of-way lines of Hamilton Road and along westerly lines of said 7.507 acre tract: (1) South 12° 10' 08" East for a distance of 104.34' to an iron pin set; thence, (2) South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 250.00' to an iron pin set; thence, (3) South 06° 26' 22" West for a distance of 300.17' to an iron pin set; thence, (4) South 01° 15' 35" West for a distance of 160.67' to a point, said point referenced by an iron pin set that bears North 85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 5.00' from said corner, said point also being along the northerly line of a 49.736 acre tract, the residual of a 49.998 acre tract as conveyed to Madison Local School District as described in Deed Book 3336 Page 482; thence, Along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and along the northerly line of said 49.736 acre tract, North 85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 1496.33' to a point, passing over an iron pin set at a distance of 5.00' from the beginning of this course and passing over an iron pin set at a distance of 3.00' from the terminus of this course, said point also witnessed by an iron pin that bears South 04° 18' 59" West for a distance of 3.00' from said point; said point also being the southeasterly corner of a 0.2625 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 Tract 1, said point also being the northeasterly corner of a 0.2625 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 Tract 2, thence, Along the easterly line of said 0.2625 acre tract as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 Tract 1 and then along the easterly line of a 4.647 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201511160161625 and then along the easterly line of a 1.6187 acre tract as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 and then along the easterly line of a 2.10 acre tract as conveyed to Corporation of the Presiding Bishop of the Church of Jesus Christ of the Latter-Day Saints as described in Deed Book 3752 Page 204, North 04° 18' 59" East for a distance of 1100.52' to a 1" iron pipe found, passing over an iron pin set at a distance of 288.33' from the terminus of this course, said point being the northwesterly corner of said 40.00 acre tract, said point also being the northeasterly corner of said 2.10 acre tract, said point also being along the southerly line of a 4.410 acre tract as conveyed to Mulligan Real Estate II, LLC as described in Instrument No. 201403140031424; thence, Along the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and along the southerly line of said 4.410 acre tract and then along the southerly line of a 1.500 acre tract as conveyed to Charles and Vicki Golden as described in Instrument No. 200108140187784, Instrument No 200108140187785 and Instrument No. 200108140187788 and then along the southerly line of a 3.00 acre tract as conveyed to Kinell Properties, LLC as described in Instrument No. 201201050001830 and then along the southerly line of a 2.433 acre tract as conveyed to Peerless Saw Company as described in Official Record 8645 B-05, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance of 1224.44' to a 1" iron pipe found, said point being the southeasterly corner of said 2.433 acre tract and being along the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (60' right-of-way as dedicated in Plat Book 46 Page 93); thence, Along the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard, South 20° 36' 06" East for a distance of 320.30' to a railroad spike found; thence, Along the southerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance of 110.81' to the point of beginning, containing 36.400 acres of land, more or less, as determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The Kleingers Group in June, 2017. Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935". Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, ordinances or agreements of record. Tract 20 Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, R.C. Section 501.01; also being a portion of school lands as described in a Journal Entry by the Office of the Auditor of the State of Ohio, Volume 17 Page 48 (dated 7/14/1966), allocating a 40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational School District, now known as The Eastland-Fairfield Career & Technical Schools; being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 317; right-of-way varies) and the northerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in "Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46 Page 93; said point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, as recorded in Deed Book 3241 Page 395 Parcel 22-WL, said point being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning point running Along the northerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard, North 85° 36' 06" West for a distance of 62.95' to an iron pin set at a point of curvature; thence, Along the northerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard following a curve to the right having an arc length of 28.36', a radius of 25.00', a central angle of 65° 00' 00", and a chord that bears North 53° 06' 06" West for a distance of 26.86' to an iron pin set at a point of tangency; thence, Along the easterly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard, North 20° 36' 06" West for a distance of 216.10' to a 1" iron pipe found in the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, said point being the southwesterly corner of a 3.381 acre tract as conveyed to 4343 South Hamilton Road, LLC as described in Instrument No. 199901040000730; thence, Along the northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and the southerly line of said 3.381 acre tract, South 85° 36' 06" East for a distance of 170.62' to a 1" iron pipe found, said point being the southeasterly corner of said 3.381 acre tract, said point being along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road; thence, Along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road, South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 40.22' to a 1" iron pipe found; thence, Along a westerly line of said 7.507 acre tract and along the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road, South 02° 14' 23" West for a distance of 170.20' to the point of beginning, containing 0.598 acres of land, more or less, as determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The Kleingers Group in June, 2017. Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935". Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, ordinances or agreements of record. Tract 21 Situated in the City of Groveport, County of Franklin, State of Ohio; also being a part of Section 16, Township 11 North, Range 21 West, Congress Lands as held in trust by the State of Ohio pursuant to Ohio School and Ministerial Lands, R.C. Section 501.01; also being a portion of school lands as described in a Journal Entry by the Office of the Auditor of the State of Ohio, Volume 17 Page 48 (dated 7/14/1966), allocating a 40.00 acre tract to Eastern Franklin County Joint Vocational School District, now known as The Eastland-Fairfield Career & Technical Schools; being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a 1" iron pipe found at the intersection of the westerly right-of-way line of Hamilton Road (State Route 317; right-of-way varies) and the southerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard (80' right-of-way) as dedicated in "Dedication of Williams Road, Marketing Place, Directors Boulevard, Investor Avenue, and Eastland School Avenue (Eastland Corporate Park I)" as recorded in Plat Book 46 Page 93; said point also being along a westerly line of a 7.507 acre tract as transferred to the State of Ohio, Department of Transportation, as recorded in Deed Book 3241 Page 395 Parcel 22-WL, thence the following four courses along the westerly right-of-way lines of Hamilton Road and along westerly lines of said 7.507 acre tract: (1) South 12° 10' 08" East for a distance of 104.34' to an iron pin set; thence, (2) South 04° 31' 49" West for a distance of 250.00' to an iron pin set; thence, (3) South 06° 26' 22" West for a distance of 300.17' to an iron pin set; thence, (4) South 01° 15' 35" West for a distance of 160.67' to a point, said point referenced by an iron pin set that bears North 85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 5.00' from said corner, said point also being along the northerly line of a 49.736 acre tract, the residual of a 49.998 acre tract as conveyed to Madison Local School District as described in Deed Book 3336 Page 482; said point being the thence, Along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and along the northerly line of said 49.736 acre tract and then along a common line between two 0.2625 acre tracts as conveyed to Groveport Madison Local School District as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 Tracts 1 and 2, North 85° 35' 40" West for a distance of 1877.52' to an iron pin set, passing over an iron pins set at a distance of 5.00' and at a distance of 1493.33 from the beginning of this course, said point being along the southerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, said point also being a common corner of said 49.736 acre tract and said 0.2625 acre tracts, said point also being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, and from said beginning point running thence, Along a common line between said 40.00 acre tract and said 49.736 acre tract, North 85° 35' 53" West for a distance of 280.18' to a point generally along Black Lick Creek, said point witnessed by a 1" iron pipe found that bears South 53° 43' 34" East for a distance of 0.93' from said point; thence, Along a westerly line of said 40.00 acre tract and generally following Black Lick Creek, North 48° 01' 47" West for a distance of 49.20' to a point, said point witnessed by a 1" iron pipe found that bears South 25° 51' 12" East for a distance of 0.54' from said point; thence, Along a northerly line of said 40.00 acre tract, South 85° 35' 53" East for a distance of 319.10' to an iron pin set, said point being the northwesterly corner of said northerly-most 0.2625 acre tract as described in Instrument No. 201601070002077 Tract 1; thence, Along the westerly line of said 0.2625 acre tract, South 04° 15' 07" West for a distance of 30.00' to the point of beginning, containing 0.206 acres of land, more or less, as determined by Michael L. Keller, Professional Surveyor, Ohio License No. 7978, based on a survey performed by The Kleingers Group in June, 2017. Basis of bearings for the herein-described courses is the State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone (NAD83-NSRS2007), with a portion of the westerly right-of-way line of Directors Boulevard being South 20° 36' 06" East as determined by a GPS survey utilizing CORS Station "COLB" and monument "FCGS 9935". Iron pins set are 5/8" rebar, 30" in length, with plastic identifier caps stamped "THE KLEINGERS GROUP". Subject to any easements, restrictions, covenants, ordinances or agreements of record. Partition Tract Sources of Title Tract Recording Reference Conveyance Type Acreage Notes 1 DB 3259 page 238 Governor's Deed 10.789 Board if FCC 2 DB 3327 page 174 Governor's Deed 44,557 Private Developer 3 DB 3336 page 482 Governor's Deed 49,998 Madison Local S. D. 4 DB 3585 page 424 Governor's Deed 7.3032 Private Developer 1.1866 5 DB 3636 page 185 Governor's Deed 64.627 Private Developer 6 DB 3636 page 225 Governor's Deed 0.144 Private Developer 7 DB 3673 page 519 Governor's Deed 11.849 Private Developer 8 DB 3718 page 413 Governor's Deed 1.320 Private Developer 9 OR 473 F10 Governor's Deed 0.0395 Private Developer 9 OR 485 B 19 Governor's Deed 0.0395 Re-record OR 473 F10 10 OR 721 A12 Governor's Deed 0.104 Private Developed 11 OR 1067 D17 Governor's Deed 4.0697 Private Developed 0.1784 0.4689 12 OR 1739 106 Governor's Deed 42.849 Private Developed 13 OR 2103 J16 Governor's Deed 5.211 Private Developer 14 OR 2891 119 Governor's Deed 54.788 Private Developed 11.9133 0.1882 15 OR 4791 F07 Governor's Deed 0.2625 Private Developer 16 OR 4951 J10 Governor's Deed 4.647 Private Developer 17 OR 12990 G07 Governor's Deed 11.524 Private Developer 18 OR 15062 J04 Governor's Deed 0.863 Private Developer 19 36.400 Eastland-Fairfield 20 0.598 Eastland-Fairfield 21 0.026 Eastland-Fairfield Rights of Way All of the above-described real estate is subject to the following Rights-of-Way as established by the Franklin County Commissioners: Bixby Road in Road Record 7 page 63. Williams Road in Road Record 7 page 347. Hendron Road in Road Record 7 page 397. Hamilton Road Record 8 page 470. AND, Subject to the following easement Rights-of-Way and Rights-of Entry for SR-317 as established by deed to the State of Ohio in Deed Book 3241 page 395 and Deed Book 3189 page 623, respectively more particularly described as follows: PARCEL NO. 22-WL Being a parcel of land lying on the right and left sides of the centerline of a survey, made by the Department of Highways, and recorded in Book 41, Page 65, of the records of Franklin County and being located within the following described points in the boundary thereof: Beginning at a point in the grantor's southerly line and the northerly line of Section 21 and in the southerly line of Section 16 which lies North 85° 19' 06" W., a distance of 135.62 feet from the half-section corner, said point being 150.00 feet right of and radially from Station 103+12.60 in the centerline of a survey made in 1968 by the Ohio Department of Highways of State Route 317, Section 6.38 in Franklin County; thence N. 85° 19' 06" W., a distance of 339.31 feet passing the centerline of Survey at P.O.C. Station 102+37.94 along the grantor's southerly line and the northerly line of the Fern Cole 136.670 acre tract of land of record in Volume 2616, Page 454 of the Franklin County Deed Records and also along the southerly lime of Section 16 to a point 150.00 feet left of and radially from Station 101+53.82; thence 1274.29 feet along the line of a circular curve to the left, the radius of which is 2714.79 feet, the delta of which is 26° 53' 38", and the chord of which bears N. 20° 43' 07" E., a distance of 1262.62 feet to a point 150.00 feet left and radially from C.S. Station 114+98.52; thence. 9° 10" 10" E., a distance of 293.14 feet to a point 130.00 feet left of S.T. Station 117+98.52; thence N. 11 20" 42"E., a distance of 203.03 feet to a point 105.00 left of Station 120+ 00.00; thence N. 6° 25' 09" E., a distance of 400.28 feet to a point 90.00 feet left of Station 124+00.00; thence N. 4° 16' 18" E., a distance of 620.10 feet to a point 90.00 feet left and along the angular bisector from P. I. Station 130+19.90; thence N. 4° 31' 58" E., a distance of 330.31 feet to a point 90.00 feet left of Station of 130+50.00; thence N. 1° 15" 44" E., a distance of 300.17 feet to a point 110.00 feet left of Station 137+00.00; thence N. 6° 26' 31" E., a distance of 300.17 feet to a point 100.00 feet left of Station 140+00.00; thence N. 4° 31' 58" E., a distance of 250.00 feet to a point 100.00 feet left of Station 142+50.00; thence N. 12° 09' 59" W., a distance of 104.40 feet to a point 130.00 feet left of Station 143+50.00; thence N. 2° 14' 31" E., a distance of 250.20 feet to a point 140.00 feet left of Station146+00.00; thence N. 4° 31' 58" E., a distance of 300.00 feet to a point 140.00 feet left of Station 149+00.00; thence N. 15° 50' 33" E., a distance of 152.97 feet to a point 110.00 feet left of Station 150+50.00; thence N. 4° 31' 58" E., a distance of 300.00 feet to a point 110.00 left of Station 153+50.00; thence N. 00° 02' 28" W., a distance of 250.80 feet to a point 130.00 feet left of Station 156+00.00; thence N. 30° 15' 51" W., a distance of 131.43 feet to a point in the grantor's Northerly line and the northerly line of Section 16 and in the southerly line of Section 9, said point being 205.00 feet left of Station 157+07.93; thence S. 85° 48' 24" E., a distance of 285.00 feet along the grantor's northerly line and the southerly line of the Dorothy M. Davis and Marguerite C. Hinton 6.208 acre tract of land of record in Volume 2375, Page 396 of Franklin County Deed Records and the northerly line of Section 16 and the southerly line of Section 9, passing the centerline of Survey at P.O.T. Station 157+09.14 to a point 80.00 feet right of Station 157+09.61: thence S. 4° 31' 58" W., a distance of 209.61 feet to a point 80.00 feet right of Station 155+00.00; thence S. 1° 05' 57" W., a distance of 500.90 feet to a point 110.00 feet right of Station 150+00.00; thence S. 4° 31' 58" W., a distance of 500.00 feet to a point 110.00 feet right of Station 145+00.00; thence S. 10° 48' 38" W., a distance of 100.60 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of Station 144+00.00; thence S. 4° 31' 58" W., a distance of 1379.87 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of and along the angular bisector from P. I. Station 130+19.90; thence S. 4° 16' 18" W., a distance of 1221.15 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of S.T. Station 117+98.52; thence S. 6° 58' 12" W., a distance of 305.02 feet to a point 90.00 feet right of and radially from C.S. Station 114+98.52; thence S. 9° 15' 26" W., a distance of 204.66 feet to a point 90.00 feet right of and radially from Station 113+00.00; thence S. 7° 18" 52" W., a distance of 114.03 feet to a point 100.00 feet right of and radially from Station 111+90.00; thence S. 27° 26' 40" W., a distance of 42.52 feet to a point 90.00 feet right of and radially from Station 111+50.00; thence S. 8° 24' 35" W., a distance of 369.32 feet to a point 150.00 feet right of and radially from Station 108+00.00; thence 512.92 feet along the line of the circular curve to the right, the radius of which us 3014.79 feet, the delta of which is 9° 44' 53", and the chord if which bears S., 26°06' 57" W., a distance of 512.29 feet to the point of beginning containing 28.207 acres, more or less, of which the present road occupies 7.507 acres, more or less. Except that the grantor reserves the right to ingress and egress right of and radially from Station 114+50; left of and radially from Station 114+50, right of Station 128+04.20, left of Station 128+04.20, right of Station 143+80.20, and left of Station 143+80.20. PARCEL NO. 22-WD Beginning at a point in the line between Section 21 and Section 16 which lies N. 85° 19" 06" W., a distance of 474.93 feet from the half section point; said point being 150.00 feet left of and radially from Station 101+53.82 in the centerline of a survey made in 1968 by the Ohio Department of Highways of State Route 317, Section 6.38, in Franklin County; thence N. 85° 19' 06" W., a distance of 319.98 feet along the section line to a point 1.13 feet right of Station 5+50.00 in the centerline of Bixby Road West, as the same was established as part of the aforementioned survey of State Route 317; thence N. 4° 40' 19" E., a distance of 41.23 feet to a point 40.00 feet left of Station 5+50.00; thence S. 85° 19' 06" E., a distance of 341.54 feet parallel to the section line to a point 150.00 feet left of and radially from State Route 317 Station 102+00.72; thence S. 33° 41' 48" W., a distance of 44.45 feet to the point of the beginning containing 0.299 acres, more or less, of which the present road occupies 0.224 acres, more or less. PARCEL NO. 22 – WD-1 Beginning at a point which lies 90.00 feet right of and radially from C. S. Station 114+98.52 in the centerline of a survey made in 1968 by The Ohio Department of Highways of State Route 317, Section 6.38, in Franklin County; thence N. 6° 58' 12" E., a distance of 305.02 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of S.T. Station 117+98.52; thence N. 4° 16' 18" E., a distance of 1221.15 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of and along the angular bisector from P.I. Station 130+19.90: thence N. 4° 31' 58"E., a distance of 1379.87 feet to a point 99.00 feet right of Station 144+00.00; thence N. 10° 48' 38" E., a distance of 100.60 feet to a point 110.00 feet right of Station 145.00.00; thence S. 12° 09' 59" E., a distance of 104.40 feet to a point 140.00 feet right of Station 144+00.00; thence S. 4° 31' 58" W., a distance of 400.00 feet to a point 140.00 feet right of Station 140+00.00; thence S. 3° 56" 53" W., a distance of 979.81 feet to a point 150.00 feet right of and along the angular bisector from P.I. Station 130+19.90: thence S. 4° 16' 18" W., a distance of 1019.56 feet to a point 150.00 feet right of Station 120+00.00; thence S. 6° 00' 31" W., a distance of 508.96 feet to point 140.00 feet right of and radially from C. S> Station 114+98.52; thence N. 82° 43" 42" W., a distance of 50.00 feet to the point of beginning.. It is understood that the tract of land above described contains 3.213 acres, more or less, exclusive of the present road which occupies 0.000 acres, more or less. All of the above descriptions are based on a survey made under the direction of David B. Guthrie, Registered Surveyor No. 4378. AND Subject to the existing easement Rights-of-Way for US-33 delineated and occupied as Parcels 42-LA, 42-X1, 42-X2, 42-X3, 42-Y1, 42-Y2 and 42-WA on the State of Ohio Department of Highways plan set titled FRA-33-(26.21-30.13). The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the deed. (B) Pursuant to various Acts of Congress, section 16 in every township was dedicated for the use of schools (the "school lands"). In 1985, pursuant to former sections 501.01, et seq., of the Ohio Revised Code, the Ohio Department of Administrative Services was granted administrative control of school lands. Then in 1988, sections 501.01, et seq., of the Ohio Revised Code were amended to grant administrative control of school lands to the board of education of each school district. The real estate described herein are the remaining portions of section 16 in Madison Township, Franklin County, which have not been conveyed to purchasers over the years. The real estate is currently titled in the records of the Franklin County Auditor as State of Ohio for the use and benefit of the Department of Administrative Services. The purpose of this legislation is to correct title of the real estate to the State of Ohio for the use and benefit of the Board of Education of the Groveport Madison Local School District. (C) The conveyance is subject to all easements, covenants, conditions, leases, and restrictions of record: all legal highways and public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. (D) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. (E) The Director of the Department of Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services for recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Franklin County Recorder. (F) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 5. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed in the name of the State conveying to the Madison County Board of Commissioners ("Grantee"), and its successors and assigns, all of the State's right, title, and interest in the following described real estate: The following described 10.8003-acre tract is situated in the State of Ohio, Madison County, Deer Creek Township, VMS 6246, being part of a 579.44 original acre tract (Deer Creek Township Parcel 05-00542.000) as conveyed to the State of Ohio Madison Correctional Prison by Deed Book 134 page 347, and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a mag nail set in the centerline of State Route 38, in the line between VMS 6246 and VMS 6169, in the line between Deer Creek Township and the City of London, being the Southeast corner of a 1.000-acre tract conveyed to Tom Farms Inc by Deed Book 278 page 889 and a corner to said 579.44 original acre tract, said mag nail bears North 15° 36' 05" West a distance of 5646.35 feet from Madison County Monument 02-004, said mag nail bears North 04° 15' 00" East a distance of 1079.10 feet from the intersection of the centerline of State Route 38 with the line between Deer Creek Township and Union Township; Thence, with the centerline of State Route 38, said VMS line and said Corp. line, South 04° 15' 00" West a distance of 616.00 feet to a mag nail set; Thence, across said 579.44 original acre tract with the following two new courses: (1) South 81° 53' 47" West, passing an iron pin and cap set at 35.00 feet, a total distance of 728.66 feet to an iron pin and cap set; (2) North 10° 12' 38" West a distance of 569.69 feet to an iron pin and cap set in the South line of a 100 original acre tract conveyed to Tom Farms Inc by Deed Book 268 page 770. Thence, with the South line of said 100 original acre tract, North 79° 47' 22" East, passing a 1/2-inch diameter iron pipe found at the Southwest corner of said Tom Farms Inc's 1.000 acre tract at 591.70 feet, passing a 5-inch diameter steel post in concrete found at 849.53 feet, a total distance of 881.99 feet returning to the Point of Beginning, containing 10.8003 Acres more or less. Bearings are based on the centerline of State Route 38 (North 04° 15' 00" East) as described in Official Record 307, page 2131. Subject to and with the benefit of all legal highways, restrictions, easements, limitations, and reservations, of record, if any and to zoning restrictions which have been imposed thereon, if any. All iron pins set are 5/8-inch diameter rebar with yellow plastic cap stamped "Cottrill Surveying." This description is based on an actual field survey performed by Nathan L. Cottrill, PS registration #8821 on October 25, 2024. The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the deed. (B)(1) The conveyance includes all improvements and chattels situated on the real estate, and is subject to all leases, agreements, licenses, permits, memoranda of understanding, easements, covenants, conditions, reservations, and restrictions of record, and encroachments whether of record or not; all legal highways and public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. (2) The deed or deeds for the conveyance of the real estate may contain restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, and other terms and conditions the Director of Administrative Services determines to be in the best interest of the State. (3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the State or the Ohio Department of Rehabilitation without the necessity of further legislation. (C) The Director of Administrative Services shall offer the real estate to Madison County Board of Commissioners through a real estate purchase agreement. Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate shall be at a price acceptable to the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of the Ohio Department of Rehabilitation. If the Madison County Board of Commissioners does not complete the purchase of the real estate within the time period provided in the real estate purchase agreement, the Director of Administrative Services may use any reasonable method of sale considered acceptable by the Ohio Department of Rehabilitation to determine an alternate grantee willing to complete the purchase within three years after the effective date of this section. The Ohio Department of Rehabilitation shall pay all advertising costs, additional fees, and other costs incident to the sale of the real estate. (D) The real estate described in division (A) of this section shall be sold as an entire tract and not in parcels. (E) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. The net proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Leased Property Maintenance and Operating Fund under section 5120.22 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) Upon execution of the real estate purchase agreement, the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services for recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Madison County Recorder. (2) The intent of this conveyance is for the Purchaser to use the real estate for the operational use of the Madison County Sheriff's Department; therefore, the deed shall contain a restriction stating that if the real estate described in division (A) of this section is no longer being used for the operations of the Madison County Sheriff's Department, the real estate described in division (A) of this section shall revert back to the State of Ohio at the sole discretion of the Director of Administrative Services and the Ohio Department of Rehabilitation and Correction, at the purchase price of the real estate described in division (A) of this section. (G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 6. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed in the name of the State conveying to the Secretary of the United States Air Force, and its successors and assigns, all of the State's right, title, and interest in the building, the National Aviation Hall of Fame, located on the following described real estate: Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Montgomery, Township of Mad River, part of Section 18, Town 2, Range 7 MRS and being part of the Wright-Patterson Air Force Base being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the Northeast corner of Building No. 487, also known as Hangar No. 2 of the Air Force Museum: Thence South 45 degrees -06 minutes -30seconds West, along the face of the North wall of said Building No. 487, a distance of 278.21 feet to the real place of beginning of the following described tract; Thence continuing South 45 degrees -06 minutes -30 seconds West, along the face of wall of said Building No. 487, a distance of 179.49 feet to a corner of the passageway between said Building No. 487 and Building No. 489 of the museum also known as Hangar No. 1 of the Air Force Museum. Thence along the face of wall of said passageway by the next three courses; Thence North 44 degrees -53 minutes-30 seconds West, a distance of 34.70 feet; Thence North 45 degrees -06 -30 seconds East, a distance of 29.90 feet; Thence North 44 degrees -53minutes-30 seconds West, a distance of 55.30 feet; Thence North 45 degrees -06 minutes -30 seconds East, a distance of 149.59 feet to a point in the face of the South wall of Building No. 489; Thence South 44 degrees -53 minutes -30 seconds East, a distance of 90.00 feet to the place of beginning, containing, 0.3329 Acre (14,500.63 square feet); Along with the right of ingress and egress over open base roads. The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the deed. (B) The conveyance includes the building, and any improvements, fixtures, and chattels contained within the building. The conveyance does not include the land, which is not owned by the State of Ohio. (C) Consideration for the conveyance of the building described in division (A) of this section shall be $0. The Director of Administrative Services shall offer the building to the Secretary of the United States Air Force as a gift. If the United States Air Force does not accept the gift, the Director of Administrative Services may use any reasonable method considered acceptable by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission to determine an alternate grantee willing to accept the building as a gift within three years after the effective date of this section. The Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall pay all advertising costs, additional fees, and other costs incident to the transfer of the building. (D) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the transfer, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. (E) Upon acceptance of the gift, the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the building described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services for recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Montgomery County Recorder. (F) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 7. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed in the name of the State conveying to Trumbull County Metropolitan Park District ("Grantee"), and its successors and assigns, all of the State's right, title, and interest in the following described real estate: Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Trumbull being a part of Lots 9, 14, 31, 36, 53, 57, 58, 72, and 75 (Twp. 5-N, Range 4-W) of Champion Township, and part of Lots 4, 5, 9, 11, 12, 29, 36 and 45 (Twp. 6-N, Range 4-W) of Bristol Township, and parts of Lots 87 through 94 inclusive and 101 through 119 inclusive (Twp. 7-N, Range 4-W) of Bloomfield Township, Connecticut Western Reserve, and being more fully described as follows: Commencing at the intersection of the centerlines of Champion Avenue and the original centerline of the Penn Central Railroad; Thence North 24° 23' 08" West a distance of 31.72 feet to an iron pipe set on the north right of way line of Champion Avenue and being THE TRUE PLACE OF BEGINNING of the tract herein to be described: Thence South 84° 33' 34" West, along the north right of way line of Champion Avenue, a distance of 169.85 feet to an iron pipe set on the east line of the lands of Northwood Golf Club; Thence North 01° 27' 18" West a distance of 216.29 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 26° 52' 59" West a distance of 899.50 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 84° 33' 34" West a distance of 24.71 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 26° 52' 59" West a distance of 1141.27 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 75; Thence North 85° 33' 34" East, along the north line of Lot 75, a distance of 24.88 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 26° 55' 56" West a distance of 4036.83 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 63° 04' 04" West a distance of 13.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 26° 55' 56" West (passing through the centerline of State Route 305 at 322.00 feet) a total distance of 355.31 feet to an iron pipe set on the north right of way line of State Route 305; Thence South 88° 50' 04" West, along the north right of way line of State Route 305, a distance of 94.48 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 26° 55' 56" West a distance of 788.90 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 88° 50' 04" East a distance of 120.02 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 26° 55' 56" West a distance of 3650.27 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 19° 00' 46" West a distance of 346.00 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 11° 06' 20", a radius of 2850.973 feet, a chord which bears North 14° 28' 32" West, a chord distance of 551.732 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency, being on the west line of Lot 36; Thence along the west lines of Lots 36, 31 and 14, North 08° 55' 22" West a distance of 7263.35 feet to an iron pipe set at the southwest corner of Lot 9; Thence North 88° 07' 48" East a distance of 0.50 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 08° 58' 02" West a distance of 1111.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 88° 07' 48" East a distance of 6.55 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 08° 58' 02" West a distance of 1502.62 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Town-Line Road; Thence South 88° 30' 46" West, along the centerline of Town-Line Road, a distance of 7.06 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 08° 58' 02" West a distance of 5545.66 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 08° 05' 54", a radius of 5404.557 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 55' 05" West, a chord distance of 763.254 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 00° 52' 08" West, a distance of 9099.29 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of State Route 88; Thence North 00° 55' 33" West, a distance of 6675.01 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Hyde-Oakfield Road; Thence South 77° 54' 27" West, along the centerline of said road, a distance of 152.90 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 00° 54' 13" West a distance of 549.78 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 05' 54" East a distance of 117.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 54' 06" West a distance of 2285.04 feet to an iron pipe set on the south right of way line of Mahan-Denman Road; Thence North 73° 34' 29" East, along the south right of way line of said road, a distance of 34.25 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 54' 06" West a distance of 1642.48 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 44' 09", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 16' 11" West, a chord distance of 1342.503 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 07° 38' 15" West a distance of 741.51 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 06° 37' 43", a radius of 11492.192 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 19' 24" West, a chord distance of 1328.817 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 01° 00' 32" West, along the west line of Lots 118, 117, 116, 115, i14, 113 and 112 a distance of 11358.57 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Burton-Bloomfield Road; Thence North 89° 02' 50" East, along the centerline of said road and the north line of Lot 112, a distance of 3.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 01° 00' 32" East (being 30.0 feet west of and parallel to the west line of Lots 111 and 110) a distance of 3362.67 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 93; Thence South 89° 07' 40" West, along the north line of Lot 93, a distance of 3.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 01° 00' 32" West (being 33.0 feet west of and parallel to the west line of Lots 109 and 108) a distance of 2463.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 07' 40" East a distance of 3.0 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 01° 00' 32" West (being 30.0 feet west of and parallel to the west line of Lot 108) a distance of 820.00 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Haines-East Road; Thence South 89° 07' 40" West, along the north line of Lot 91 and the centerline of said road a distance of 3.0 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 01° 00' 32" West (being 33.0 feet west of and parallel to the west line of Lots 107, 106, 105 and 104) a distance of 5293.02 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 07° 46' 31", a radius of 11492.192 feet, a chord which bears North 02° 52' 44" East, a chord distance of 1558.342 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 06° 45' 59" East a distance of 393.14 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 01° 53' 06", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears North 05° 49' 26" East, a chord distance of 375.921 feet to an iron pipe set on the county line common to Trumbull County and Ashtabula County; Thence North 88° 34' 38" East, along the north line of Trumbull County (passing iron pipes set at 3.02 feet and 33.20 feet) a total distance of 66.40 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 01° 55' 17", a radius of 11492.192 feet, a chord which bears South 05° 40' 20" West, a chord distance of 385.382 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence South 06° 45' 59" West a distance of 393.14 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 01° 05' 42", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears South 06° 13' 08" West, a chord distance of 218.35 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 103; Thence South 88° 34' 38" West, along the south line of Lot 103 a distance of 3.02 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 40' 43", a radius of 11429.192 feet, a chord which bears South 02° 19' 49" West, a chord distance of 1331.452 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence South 01° 00" 32" East (being 30.0 feet east of and parallel to the west lines of Lots 104, 105, and 106) a distance of 3630.382 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 106; Thence North 89° 07' 40" East, a distance of 3.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 00' 32" West (being 33.0 feet east of and parallel to the west line of Lot 107) a distance of 1662.79 feet to a railroad spike set in the-centerline of Haines-East Road; Thence South 89° 07' 40" West, along the centerline of said road, and the south line of Lot 107, a distance of 3.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence South 01° 00' 32" East (being 30.0 feet east of and parallel with the west line of Lots 108, 109, 110 and 111, a distance of 6645.58 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Burton-Bloomfield Road; Thence North 89° 02' 51" East, along the centerline of said road, and the south line of Lot 111, a distance of 3.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence South 01° 00' 32" East a distance of 334.75 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 88° 40' 35" West a distance of 3.05 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 19' 25" East a distance of 109.25 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 88° 40' 35" East, a distance of 2.45 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 00' 32" East (being 66.0 feet east of and parallel to the west lines of Lots 112, 113, 114 and 115) a distance of 5368.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 59' 28" East a distance of 33.0 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 00' 32" East a distance of 825.00 feet to a rail­road spike set in the centerline of Dunkerton-East Road; Thence South 88° 59' 28" West, along the centerline of Dunkerton-East Road, a distance of 33.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence South 01° 00' 32" East (being 66.0 feet east of the west line of Lots 115, 116, 117 and 118) a distance of 4721.51 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 37' 43", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears South 04° 19' 24" East, a chord distance of 1321.185 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence South 07° 38' 15" East a distance of 741.51 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 06° 44' 09", a radius of 11492.192 feet, a chord which bears South 04° 16' 11" East, a chord distance of 1350.258 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence South 00° 54' 06" East, a distance of 1738.96 to an iron pipe set; Thence South 24° 47' 13" East, a distance of 81.50 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 54' 06" East, a distance of 245.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 18° 16' 03" West, a distance of 100.50 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 54' 06" East, a distance of 2296.84 feet to a rail­road spike set in the centerline of Hyde-Oakfield Road; Thence South 00° 55' 33" East, a distance of 5867.36 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 65° 48' 23" East, a distance of 5.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 16° 55' 13" East, a distance of 250.05 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 55' 33" East a distance of 530.00 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of State Route 88; Thence South 65° 48' 23" West, along the centerline of State Route 88, a distance of 44.05 feet to a state highway monument box; Thence South 00° 52' 08" East, a distance of 9127.76 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 51° 54' 11", a radius of 5305.557 feet, a chord which bears South 04° 55' 05" East, a chord distance of 749.273 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence South 08° 58' 02" East a distance of 3144.86 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 56' 02" East a distance of 59.60 feet to an iron pipe on the east line of lot 12; Thence South 01° 23' 14" East, along the east line of Lot 12, a distance of 446.425 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 08° 58' 02" East a distance of 4575.05 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 9; Thence South 08° 55' 22" East a distance of 6876.45 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 17° 50' 22" East, a radius of 5670.15 feet, a chord which bears South 18° 18' 18" East, a chord distance of 1758.32 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 89° 20' 05" West, a distance of 22.20 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 26° 55' 21" East, a distance of 10362.75 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 02° 27' 09", a radius of 562.65 feet, a chord which bears South 25° 39' 24" East, a chord distance of 246.64 feet, to an iron pipe set on the north right of way of Champion Avenue; Thence South 84° 33' 34" West, along the north right of way line of Champion Avenue, a distance of 34.91 feet to The True Place of Beginning; Containing 153.799 acres, of which 53.099 acres are in Champion Township, 59.466 acres in Bristol Township and 41.234 acres in Bloomfield Township. Iron pipes set are 111 O.D. x 30" length steel pipes with a yellow plastic cap stamped STULTS AND ASSOCIATES, INC. The bearing system herein are referenced to and derived from the Ohio State Plane Coordinate System, North Zone (pages Ohio revised code, Sections 157.01 to 157.07 inclusive). All distances, bearings and coordinates have been converted from geographic position to plane coordinate position based on the Lambert conformal conic projection. The coordinates of The True Place of Beginning are North 596,499.89831 and East 2,461,031.30901. This survey is made subject to all easements, restrictions, and rights-of-way that are recorded or unrecorded. A survey plat entitled "Plat of Survey of Land of the Penn Central Corporation to be acquired by The State of Ohio" consists of Sheet No. 1 through Sheet No. 14 inclusive, is to be recorded upon final acquisition with the Recorder's Office of Trumbull County. The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services or the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the deed. (B)(1) The conveyance includes all privileges, rights, easements, and appurtenances to the real estate, and any buildings and other structures and improvements erected thereon, and is subject to all leases, easements, reservations, restrictions, licenses, permits, memoranda of understanding, agreements, conditions, and covenants of record and encroachments whether of record or not; all legal highways and public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. (2) The deed or deeds may contain restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, and other terms and conditions the Director of Administrative Services determines to be in the best interest of the State. (3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the State or the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, without the necessity of further legislation. (C) Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate described in division (A) of this section shall be $1.00. The Director of Administrative Services shall offer the real estate to Trumbull County Metropolitan Park District through a real estate purchase agreement. Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate shall be at a price acceptable to the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority. If Trumbull County Metropolitan Park District does not complete the purchase of the real estate within the time period provided in the real estate purchase agreement, the Director of Administrative Services may use any reasonable method of sale considered acceptable by the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, to determine an alternate grantee willing to complete the purchase within three years after the effective date of this section. The Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, shall pay all advertising costs, additional fees, and other costs incident to the sale of the real estate. (D) The real estate described in division (A) of this section may be conveyed as an entire tract or as multiple parcels. (E) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. The net proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Rail Development Fund (Fund 4N40) under section 4981.09 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) Upon payment of the purchase price, the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services for recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Trumbull County Recorder. (2) The intent of this conveyance is for the Purchaser to use the real estate for recreational purposes; therefore, the deed shall contain a restriction stating that if the real estate described in division (A) of this section is no longer being used for recreational purposes, the real estate described in division (A) of this section shall revert back to the State of Ohio at the sole discretion of the Director of the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, at the purchase price of the real estate described in division (A) of this section. (G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 8. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed in the name of the State conveying to Ashtabula County Metropolitan Park District ("Grantee"), and its successors and assigns, all of the State's right, title, and interest in the following described real estate: Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Ashtabula being a part of Sections 3, 4, 7, 8, 13, 14, 18, 17, 23 and 24 (Township 8-North, Range 4-West) of Orwell Township, and part of Lots 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26,27, 28, 29, 30, 33, 32, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39 and 40 (Township 9-North, Range 4-West) of Rome Township, and part of Lots 6, 7, 17, 27, 37, 47, 57, 67, 76, 77, 86, 87, 96, 106, 116, 126, 127, 136, 137, 146, 147, 156 and 157 (Township 10-North, Range 4-West) of Morgan Township, and parts of Lots 6, 7, 16, 26, 36, 46, 56, 57, 67, 66, 76, 77, 86, 87, 96 and 97 (Township 11-North, Range 4-West) of Austinburg Township, and part of Lots 48, 49, 51, 52, 78, 79, 85, 86 and 87 (Township 12-North, Range 4-West) of Saybrook Township, and part of Lots 16 and 17 (Township 12-North, Range 3-West) of Ashtabula Township, and part of Lot 16 of The City of Ashtabula, Connecticut Western Reserve, and being more fully described as follows: Beginning at an iron pipe set at the southeast corner of Section 23 (Township 8-North, Range 4-West) in Orwell Township, being on the county line common to Ashtabula County and Trumbull County; Thence South 88° 34' 38" West, along said common county line (passing an iron pipe set at 35.69 feet, and passing through an iron pipe set on the centerline of the railroad at 68.89 feet) a total distance of 99.07 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 18' 09", a radius of 11429.192 feet, a chord which bears North 01° 43' 43" East, a chord distance of 1256.570 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 01° 25' 22" West a distance of 1223.00 feet to a rail­road spike set in the centerline of Winter Road; Thence South 89° 05' 14" West, along the centerline of Winter Road, a distance of 30.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 01° 25' 22" West, along the west right of way line of Columbia Road, a distance of 1841.47 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 88° 34' 38" East a distance of 30.00 feet to an iron pipe set on the east right of way line of Columbia Road; Thence North 01° 25' 22" West a distance of 8168.45 feet to a rail­road spike set in the centerline of U.S. Route 322; Thence South 88° 58' 16" West, along the centerline of U.S. Route 322, a distance of 3.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 01°29' 34" West a distance of 1253.73 feet to an iron pipe set on the west line of Section 14; Thence North 02° 20' 33" West, along the west line of Section 14, a distance of 1348.62 feet to an iron pipe set on the southwest corner of Section 7; Thence North 00° 53' 34'' West, along the west line of Section 7, a distance of 2674.20 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Hague Road; Thence South 89° 03' 03" West, along the centerline of said Hague Road, a distance of 8.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence continuing along the west line of Section 7 and the west line of Section 4, North 01° 29' 34" West, a distance of 4726.29 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 12° 48' 22", a radius of 5762.65 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 54' 38" East, a chord distance of 1285.32 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 11° 18' 49" East (passing through the township line common to Orwell and Rome Townships, at 2035.00 feet, more or less) a total distance of 2391.76 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 12° 22' 07", a radius of 5696.65 feet, a chord which bears North 05° 47' 46" East, a chord distance of 1227.38 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 01° 03' 18" West (being 33.00 feet west of and parallel to the east line of Lots 30, 29 and 28) a distance of 4468.69 feet to an iron pipe found; Thence South 88 ° 31' 16" West, a distance of 140.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 01° 03' 18" West a distance of 1000.00 feet to a railroad spike set on the north line of Lot 28, and being in the centerline of Dodgeville Road; Thence North 88° 31' 16" East, along the north line of Lot 28 and the centerline of said Dodgeville Road, a distance of 140.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 01° 26' 00" West (being 33.00 feet west of and parallel to the east line of Lots 27 and 26) a distance of 5347.30 feet to a railroad spike set on the north line of Lot 26, and being in the centerline of U.S. Route 6; Thence South 88° 32' 19" West, along the north line of Lot 26 and the centerline of U.S. Route 6, a distance of 47.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 01° 27' 02" West (being 113.00 feet west of and parallel to the east line of Lot 25) a distance of 1000.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 88° 32' 19" East a distance of 47.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 01° 27' 02" West (being 66.00 feet west of and parallel to the east line of Lots 25 and 24) a distance of 4358.45 feet to a railroad spike set on the north line of Lot 24, being in the centerline of Ketcham Road; Thence North 01° 26' 14" West a distance of 6113.99 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 43' 56" West a distance of 2072.80 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 21 (also being on the north line of Rome Township and the south line of Morgan Township); Thence North 00° 39' 48" West a distance of 4185.75 feet to a rail­road spike set in the centerline of Rock Creek Road; Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 571.65 feet to a point on the north waters edge of Rock Creek; Thence North 26° 01' 45" West (passing an iron pipe set at 40.00 feet) a total distance of 105.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 150.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 06° 09' 15" East a distance of 151.10 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 33' 15" East a distance of 65.80 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 1540.39 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 34° 28' 16" West a distance of 178.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 910.08 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 87° 47' 05" East a distance of 99.13 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 40' 45" West a distance of 823.23 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 38' 02" West a distance of 4116.14 feet to an iron pipe set on the centerline of Tische Road; Thence North 00° 32' 27" West a distance of 1663.87 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 76; Thence North 00° 57' 05" West a distance of 1673.80 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 66; Thence South 89° 37' 22" East, along the north line of Lot 66, a distance of 12.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 26' 27" West, a distance of 3329.39 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 47; Thence North 00° 20' 39" West a distance of 6346.68 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 89° 39' 21" West a distance of 33.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 20' 39" West a distance of 311.34 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00 ° 13' 46" West a distance of 513.66 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Eagleville-Jefferon Road; Thence North 72° 26' 11" East, along the centerline of said Eagleville-Jefferson Road, a distance of 34.57 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 539.74 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 18° 29' 32" West a distance of 105.30 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 400.00 feet to a point in or near the center of Mill Creek; Thence South 89° 46' 14" West, along or near the center of Mill Creek, a distance of 29.00 feet to a point; Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 1095.17 feet to an iron pipe set in the centerline of Mill Creek Road; Thence South 88° 51' 08" East, along the centerline of said Mill Creek Road, a distance of 13.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 108.04 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 46' 14" East a distance of 49.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00" 13' 46" West a distance of 532.00 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 97; Thence South 89° 46' 14" West, along said lot line, a distance of 47.00 feet to an iron pipe set at the northwest corner of Lot 97; Thence North 02° 28' 35" East a distance of 535.93 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 89° 46' 14" West a distance of 25.30 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 1566.62 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 83° 31' 08" East a distance of 10.07 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 13' 46" West a distance of 3289.98 feet to an iron pipe set on the north right of way line of Allen Road; Thence North 89° 09' 21" East, along the north right of way line of Allen Road, a distance of 37.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00 ° 13' 46" West a distance of 3906.81 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 07° 37' 57", a radius of 11426.192 feet, a chord which bears North 04° 02' 44" West, a chord distance of 1520.96 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 56, and being in the centerline of Lampson Road; Thence South 89° 00' 39" West, along said north line of Lot 56, and the centerline of said Lampson Road, a distance of 17.12 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 32' 14", a radius of 11409.192 feet, a chord which bears North 11° 08' 26" West, a chord distance of 1301.03 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 78° 42' 44" West a distance of 10.01 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 45' 26", a radius of 11399.192 feet, a chord which bears North 17° 47' 26" West, a chord distance of 1343.58 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 46; Thence North 89° 17' 57" West, along the north line of Lot 46, a distance of 10.78 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 02° 20' 37", a radius of 11389.192 feet, a chord which bears North 22° 21' 40" West, a chord distance of 465.802 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 23° 31' 58" West a distance of 1064.95 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 28' 02" East a distance of 40.20 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 31' 58" West a distance of 1022.77 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 20° 53' 07", a radius of 5762.65 feet, a chord which bears North 13° 05' 25" West, a chord distance of 2088.959 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of compound curve; Thence continuing on a curve with an arc to the right, having a delta of 26° 39' 42", a radius of 2633.574, a chord which bears North 10° 40' 59" East, a chord distance of 1214.463 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 88° 05' 43" West a distance of 29.98 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 45' 38" East a distance of 2657.47 feet to a rail­road spike set on the north line of Lot 16, being in the centerline of Clay Street; Thence North 88° 57' 25" East, along the north line of Lot 16, and the centerline of said Clay Street, a distance of 11.02 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 23° 44' 58" East a distance of 2885.84 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 7, also being on the township line common to Austinburg Township and Saybrook Township; Thence South 89° 15' 30" West, along the common township line, a distance of 12.02 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 44' 45" East a distance of 5313.94 feet to an iron pipe set on the north line of Lot 86; Thence South 45° 31' 02" West, along the north line of Lot 86, a distance of 57.12 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of inter­section of the centerline of Ashtabula-Austinburg Road; Thence North 23° 29' 02" East, along the tangent of said Ashtabula-­Austinburg Road, a distance of 148.5 feet to an iron pipe set on the west line of Lot 79, being in the centerline of Moody Road; Thence North 00° 47' 34" West, along the west line of Lot 79 and the centerline of Moody Road, a distance of 396.35 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 66° 15' 14" East a distance of 213.47 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 44' 45" East a distance of 1260.01 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 49' 36" East a distance of 2865.35 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 50' 37" East a distance of 5228.23 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 89° 04' 38" West a distance of 36.34 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 50' 37" East a distance of 717.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 63° 04' 37" East a distance of 33.05 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 50' 37" East a distance of 205.28 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 46' 38" East (passing through the east line of Saybrook Township, at 2552.00 feet, more or less) a total distance of 2871.98 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 23° 48' 59" East a distance of 2951.01 feet to a rail­road spike set in the centerline of State Route 84; Thence South 58° 57' 41" West, along the centerline of State Route 84, a distance of 29.53 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence North 23° 48' 59" East a distance of 370.67 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 27° 46 1 21" East a distance of 246.41 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 12° 59' 02", a radius of 11492.19 feet, a chord which bears North 30° 18' 30" East, a chord distance of 2598.70 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 36° 48' 01" East a distance of 1937.23 feet to an iron pipe set on the north side of South 58th Street (in The City of Ashtabula); Thence North 36° 45' 46" East a distance of 2906.79 feet to an iron pipe set in the lands of the N.Y.C. & St. Louis Railroad; Thence North 56° 16' 25" East (passing an iron pipe set on the original centerline of the Penn Central Railroad, at 98.81 feet) a total distance of 197.61 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 36° 45' 46" West a distance of 3105.31 feet to an iron pipe set on the south side of South 58th Street; Thence North 88° 40' 10" East, along the south side of said South 58th Street, a distance of 34.31 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 36° 48' 01", along a portion of the east right of way line of Nathan Avenue, a distance of 1946.20 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 36° 35' 28" West a distance of 83.24 feet to an iron pipe found at the southwest corner of Bardmoor Subdivision as platted in Plat Book 12, page 89, Ashtabula County Recorders Office; Thence South 45° 00' 00" East, along the south line of said Bardmoor Subdivision, a distance of 10.11 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 12° 33' 28", a radius of 11389.192 feet, a chord which bears South 30° 05' 44" West, a chord distance of 2491.282 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence South 23° 48' 59" West a distance of 245.83 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 66° 11' 0" East a distance of 20.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 48' 59" West a distance of 171.80 feet to a rail­road spike set in the centerline of State Route 84; Thence South 58° 57' 41" West, along the centerline of State Route 84, a distance of 64.28 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 48' 59" West (passing through the west line of Ashtabula Township, at 635.00 feet, more or less) a total distance of 1710.16 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00" 41' 01" East a distance of 16.88 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 48' 59" West a distance of 1347.62 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 46' 38" West a distance of 1405.99 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 66° 13' 22" East a distance of 5.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 46' 38" West a distance of 1466.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 50' 37" West a distance of 117.36 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 03° 26' 23" East a distance of 76.35 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 50' 37" West a distance of 1067.00 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 48; Thence South 89° 04' 38" West, along the south line of Lot 48, a distance of 44.05 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 50' 37" West, a distance of 1124.63 feet to a rail­road spike set on the west line of Lot 51, being in the centerline of Sanborn Road; Thence South 00° 56' 43" East, along the west line of Lot 51, and the centerline of Sanborn Road, a distance of 23.85 feet to a rail­road spike set; Thence South 23° 50' 37" West a distance of 1037.50 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 89° 16' 37" West a distance of 11.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 50' 37" West a distance of 2647.54 feet to an iron pipe found; Thence North 89° 36' 28" East a distance of 21.92 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 49' 36" West a distance of 639.20 feet to an iron pipe set on the west line of Lot 52; Thence South 00° 20' 24" East, along the west line of Lot 52, a distance of 208.98 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 85° 17' 47" West a distance of 120.15 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 49' 36" West a distance of 2014.02 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 44' 45" West a distance of 192.08 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 02° 20' 57" West a distance of 54.82 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 44' 45" West a distance of 1104.51 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 45° 03' 31" East a distance of 55.75 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 50' 31" West a distance of 443.95 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 45' 36" West a distance of 234.48 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 00° 40' 53" West a distance of 95.42 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 44' 45" West a distance of 2371.61 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 89 ° 15' 31" West a distance of 10.85 feet to a P.K. nail set in a twelve inch Cherry Tree; Thence South 23° 43' 44" West (passing through the south line of Saybrook Township, at 2713.00 feet, more or less) a total distance of 2738.76 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 44' 58" West a distance of 2862.44 feet to a rail­road spike set on the south line of Lot 6 (Austinburg Township); also being in the centerline of Clay Street; Thence North 88° 57' 25" East, along the centerline of Clay Street, a distance of 22.04 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence South 23° 45' 38" West a distance of 229.01 feet to an iron rod found; Thence South 02° 40' 44" East a distance of 112.50 feet to an iron rod found; Thence North 71° 28' 44" East a distance of 407.46 feet to an iron rod found; Thence South 01° 00' 30" East a distance of 519.94 feet to an iron rod found; Thence South 53° 20' 02" West a distance of 1049.64 feet to an iron pipe set in Coffee Creek; Thence South 89 ° 15' 51" West a distance of 56.42 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 45' 38" West a distance of 1252.18 feet to an iron pipe set 70.0 feet east of the P.T. of the point of curvature of the original centerline; Thence South 22° 24' 19" West a distance of 119.71 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 87° 42' 23" East a distance of 21.13 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 16° 53' 53" West a distance of 772.00 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 06° 25' 36", a radius of 2570.57 feet, a chord which bears South 00° 33' 56" West, a chord distance of 288.193 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of compound curve; Thence South 02° 58' 36" East a distance of 65.43 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 13' 21" East a distance of 3.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 20° 13' 34", a radius of 5696.65 feet, a chord which bears South 13° 25' 11" East, a chord distance of 2000.558 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence South 23° 31' 58" East a distance of 1050.79 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 28' 02" East a distance of 40.20 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 23° 31' 58" East a distance of 1005.52 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 09° 09' 22", a radius of 11529.19 feet, a chord which bears South 18° 57' 17" East, a chord distance of 1840.45 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 78° 42' 44" West a distance of 20.03 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 06° 34' 12", a radius of 11509.19 feet, a chord which bears South 11° 05' 49", a chord distance of 1319.01 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 47, being in the centerline of Lampson Road; Thence South 89° 00' 39" West, along the south line of Lot 47, and the centerline of Lampson Road, a distance of 17.12 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 07° 44' 48" East a distance of 30.21 feet to an iron pipe set on the south right of way line of Lampson Road; Thence North 89° 00' 39" East, along the south right of way line of Lampson Road, a distance of 379.50 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 07° 13' 44", a radius of 11869.19 feet, a chord which bears South 03° 50' 38" East, a chord distance of 1496.52 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 3905.32 feet to an iron pipe set on the north right of way line of Allen Road; Thence South 89° 36' 41" West, along the north right of way line of Allen Road, a distance of 357.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 25.00 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 67, being in the centerline of Allen Road; Thence North 89° 36' 41" East, along the south line of Lot 67, and the centerline of Allen Road, a distance of 40.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 13' 46" East (being 60.00 feet east of and parallel to the west line of Lot 77) a distance of 593.06 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 88° 28' 36" West a distance of 13.00 feet to a corner post; Thence South 00° 13' 46" East (being 47.00 feet east of and parallel to the west line of Lots 77 and 87) a distance of 2690.29 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 83° 31' 08" East a distance of 10.07 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 3816.85 feet to an iron pipe set on the south side of Mill Creek; Thence South 89° 46' 14" West a distance of 24.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 400.00 feet to an iron pipe set in Mill Creek; Thence South 18° 02' 01" West a distance of 105.30 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 13' 46" East (being 66.00 feet east of and parallel to the west line of Lot 97) a distance of 519.14 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of Eagleview-Jefferson Road; Thence North 72° 26' 12" East, along the centerline of said Eagleview-Jefferson Road, a distance of 34.57 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence South 00° 13' 46" East a distance of 330.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 89° 46' 14" West a distance of 33.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00" 13' 46" East a distance of 224.37 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 20' 40" East a distance of 6659.22 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 37; Thence South 00" 26' 27" East a distance of 3328.87 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 57; Thence South 00° 32' 27" East a distance of 3336.68 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 77, being in the centerline of Tische Road; Thence South 00° 38' 02" East a distance of 4116.13 feet to an iron pipe set on the south side of Jefferson Street; Thence South 00° 40' 45" East a distance of 3446.62 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 15° 56' 45" East a distance of 228.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 40' 45" East a distance of 80.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 22° 31' 29" West (passing an iron pipe set at 122.37 feet) a total distance of 152.37 feet to a point in Rock Creek; Thence South 00° 40' 45" East a distance of 381.73 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 127; Thence North 89° 00' 50" East a distance of 4.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 14' 28" East a distance of 996.25 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 89° 20' 12" West a distance of 14.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 39' 48" East a distance of 690.00 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 136; Thence North 89° 20' 12" East, along the south line of Lot 136, a distance of 10.00 feet to an iron pipe set at the southeast corner of Lot 136; Thence South 00° 50' 41" West a distance of 380.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 39' 48" East a distance of 1470.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 49' 05" East a distance of 27.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 39' 49" East a distance of 824.34 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Morgan Township (north line of Rome Township); Thence South 00° 43' 56" East a distance of 2072.17 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 26' 14" East a distance of 6093.80 feet to an iron pipe set on the north right of way line of Ketcham Road; Thence South 88° 55' 46" West, along the north right of way line of Ketcham Road, a distance of 20.01 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 27' 02" East, along the east line of Lots 24 and 25, a distance of 2988.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 88° 32' 58" West a distance of 7.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 27' 02" East a distance of 1390.17 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 88° 32' 19" East a distance of 150.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 27' 02" East a distance of 1000.00 feet to a railroad spike set in the centerline of U.S. Route 6; Thence South 88° 32' 19" West, along the centerline of U.S. Route 6, a distance of 150.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence South 01° 26' 00" East a distance of 289.08 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 87° 36' 35" East a distance of 33.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 26' 00" East (being 66.00 feet east of and parallel to the west line of Lot 36) a distance of 2426.30 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 36; Thence North 89° 35' 33" West, along the south line of Lot 36, a distance of 8.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 26' 00" East (being 58.00 feet east of and parallel to the west line of Lot 37) a distance of 2632.69 feet to a railroad spike set on the south line of Lot 37, being in the centerline of Dodgeville Road; Thence North 88° 31' 16" East, along the centerline of Dodgeville Road, a distance of 2.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence South 01° 03' 18" East (being 60.00 feet east of and parallel to the west line of Lot 38) a distance of 1620.32 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence North 89° 19' 02" East a distance of 13.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 03' 18" East (being 73.00 feet east of and parallel to the west line of Lots 38 and 39) a distance of 3686.19 feet to an iron pipe set on the south line of Lot 39, being in the center­line of Fillingham Road; Thence South 88° 48' 02" West, along the centerline of Fillingham Road, a distance of 40.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 03' 18" East, a distance of 162.68 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 12° 22' 07", a radius of 5762.65 feet, a chord which bears South 05° 07' 45" West, a chord distance of 1241.586 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence South 11° 18' 49" West (passing through the south line of Rome Township, at 320.00 feet, more or less) a total distance of 2391.76 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the left, having a delta of 12° 31' 23", a radius of 5696.65 feet, a chord which bears South 05° 03' 07" West, a chord distance of 1242.64 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of tangency; Thence North 88° 31' 00" East a distance of 12.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 00° 09' 14" West a distance of 420.00 feet to an iron pipe set; Thence South 01° 29' 34" East a distance of 9611.46 feet to a rail­road spike set in the centerline of U.S. Route 322; Thence South 88° 58' 16" West, along the centerline of U.S. Route 322, a distance of 3.00 feet to a railroad spike set; Thence South 01° 25' 22" East a distance of 11232.78 feet to an iron pipe set at a point of curvature; Thence with an arc to the right, having a delta of 04° 08' 29", a radius of 11489.19 feet, a chord which bears South 00° 38' 52" West, a chord distance of 830.27 feet to an iron pipe set on the west line of Section 24; Thence South 01° 25' 22" East, along the west line of Section 24 (east line of Section 23) a distance of 424.92 feet to The Place of Beginning; Containing 342.940 acres, more or less, of which 39.586 acres are in Orwell Township, including 5.896 acres in the Village of Orwell; 43.848 acres in Morgan Township, including 7.012 acres in the Village of Rock Creek; 128.847 acres are in Austinburg Township; 60.322 acres are in Rome Township; 53.044 acres are in Saybrook Township; 17.293 acres are in Ashtabula Township, including 9.285 acres in The City of Ashtabula; Iron pipes set are 1" O.D. x 30" length steel pipes with yellow plastic caps stamped STULTS AND ASSOC.; The bearing system herein are referenced to and derived from the Ohio State Plane Coordinate System, North Zone (pages Ohio revised code, Sections 157.01 to 157.07 inclusive.) All distances, bearings and coordinates have been converted from geographic position to plane coordinate position based on the Lambert conformal conic projection. The coordinates of The Place of Beginning are North 672,489.10770 and East 2,452,473.55552. This survey is made subject to all easements, restrictions and rights-of-way that are recorded or unrecorded. A survey plat entitled "Plat of Survey of Land of The Penn Central, Corporation to be acquired by The State of Ohio" consists of Sheet No. 14 through Sheet No. 37 inclusive, is to be recorded, upon final acquisition, with the Recorder's Office of Ashtabula County. The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services or the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the deed. (B)(1) The conveyance includes all privileges, rights, easements, and appurtenances to the real estate, and any buildings and other structures and improvements erected thereon, and is subject to all leases, easements, reservations, restrictions, licenses, permits, memoranda of understanding, agreements, conditions, and covenants of record and encroachments whether of record or not; all legal highways and public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. (2) The deed or deeds may contain restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, and other terms and conditions the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, determines to be in the best interest of the State. (3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the State or the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, without the necessity of further legislation. (C) Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate described in division (A) of this section shall be $1.00. The Director of Administrative Services shall offer the real estate to Ashtabula County Metropolitan Park District through a real estate purchase agreement. Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate shall be at a price acceptable to the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority. If Ashtabula County Metropolitan Park District does not complete the purchase of the real estate within the time period provided in the real estate purchase agreement, the Director of Administrative Services may use any reasonable method of sale considered acceptable by the Ohio Rail Development Commission to determine an alternate grantee willing to complete the purchase within three years after the effective date of this section. The Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, shall pay all advertising costs, additional fees, and other costs incident to the sale of the real estate. (D) The real estate described in division (A) of this section may be conveyed as an entire tract or as multiple parcels. (E) Grantee shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. The net proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Rail Development Fund (Fund 4N40) under section 4981.09 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) Upon payment of the purchase price, the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the State, countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services for recording, and delivered to the Grantee. The Grantee shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Ashtabula County Recorder. (2) The intent of this conveyance is for the Purchaser to use the real estate for recreational purposes; therefore, the deed shall contain a restriction stating that if the real estate described in division (A) of this section is no longer being used for recreational purposes, the real estate described in division (A) of this section shall revert back to the State of Ohio at the sole discretion of the Director of the Ohio Rail Development Commission, successor in interest to the Ohio Rail Transportation Authority, at the purchase price of the real estate described in division (A) of this section. (G) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 9. (A) Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 123.01 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may execute a perpetual easement in the name of the State with the City of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal corporation, and its successors and assigns, for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of a twelve inch (12") sanitary sewer pipeline, burdening the following described real estate: Situated in the Southwest Quarter of Town 1 North, Range 18 West, City of Columbus, Franklin County, Ohio and being part of Lots 1 (PID 010-032095) in the name of the State of Ohio (Ohio State University) as recorded in Vol 2663, Page 143 and Lot 2 (PID 010-004693), Lot 3 (PID 010-004692), Lot 4 (PID 010-004690), in the name of the State of Ohio (Ohio State University) as recorded in Vol 2660 Page 651 and Lots 5&6 (PID 010-004731), in the name of the State of Ohio (Ohio State University) as recorded in Vol 2668, Page 112, and part Lot 7 (PID 010-045989) in the name of the State of Ohio (Ohio State University) as recorded in Vol 2670, Page 498, and a portion of former 10th Ave. vacated per Ordinance 779-66 (010-026543) as shown on the Record Plat of the Kings Neil Ave. Subdivision Plat as recorded in Plat Book 7, Page 96 of the Exempted Lands of The Ohio State University and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a set mag nail the southeasterly corner of said Lot 1 of Kings Neil Ave. Subdivision Plat and the westerly right-of-way line of Neil Ave. and the northerly right-of-way line of W. 9th Ave., Thence along said northerly right-of-way line of West 9th Ave., North 87°01'43" West, a distance of 15.96 feet to the True Point of Beginning. Thence continuing along said northerly right-of-way line of West 9th Ave., North 87°01'43" West, a distance of 31.50 feet to a point, Thence along a line through the aforementioned Lots 1-7 the following six courses: (1) North 53°33'28" East, a distance of 47.41 feet, to a point, (2) North 08°14'18" West, a distance of 94.83 feet, to a point, (3) South 81°45'42" West, a distance of 12.00 feet, to a point, (4) North 08°14'18" West, a distance of 25.00 feet, to a point, (5) North 81°45'42" East, a distance of 12.00 feet, to a point, (6) North 08°14'18" West, a distance of 247.38 feet, to a point on the southerly line of a 1' reservation strip as shown on said Record Plat and the former northerly right-of-way line of W. 10th Ave. Thence along said southerly line of the reservation strip and the former northerly right-of-way line of W. 10th Ave. South 87°01'43" East a distance of 12.74 feet to a mag nail on the aforementioned westerly right-of-way line of Neil Ave. Thence along said westerly right-of-way line of Neil Ave. South 08°14'18" East, a distance of 386.40 feet to a point and Thence along a line through the aforementioned Lot of Kings Plat, South 53°33'28" West, a distance of 17.77 feet to the True Point of Beginning. Containing 0.1337 total acres (5824 sq. ft.) and being subject to all other easements, encumbrances, rights, reservations and restrictions that may affect the subject parcels. North and bearing system based upon the Ohio State Plane Coordinate System South Zone NAD83(11) (Converted from 12a utilizing CORPSCON) and referenced to the O.D.O.T. CORS Network and collected utilizing a Spectra SP80 Network Rover and by a field survey conducted by or under the direct supervision of J. Bryant Abt, PS #8593. The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. (B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, and the duties to be observed and performed by the City of Columbus, Ohio, with regard to the perpetual easement, and require the City of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual responsibility for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of the twelve inch (12") sanitary sewer pipeline that is currently located on the real estate. (C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual easement shall be $1.00. (D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall state the consideration and the terms and conditions for the granting of the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the State, be kept in the records of the Department of Administrative Services, and delivered to the City of Columbus, Ohio. The City of Columbus, Ohio, shall present the perpetual easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County Recorder. The City of Columbus, Ohio, shall pay the costs associated with recording the perpetual easement. (E) This section shall expire three years after its effective date. Section 10. (A) Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 123.01 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may execute a perpetual easement in the name of the state with the City of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal corporation, and its successors and assigns, for the operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing, and replacement of the Olentangy Scioto Interceptor Sewer and appurtenances thereto, burdening the following described real estate: Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of Columbus, lying in Quarter Township 3, Township 1, Range 18, United States Military District, being a 35 foot wide strip of land on, over, and across that tract conveyed to The State of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 620, Page 413 and that tract conveyed to The State of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 627, Page 253 (all references are to the records of the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio) and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning, for reference, at the Southeast corner of the "Reserve" as shown on the Plat titled "ELIZABETH J. McMILLEN - HOMESTEAD" of record in Plat Book 4, Page 400, at the intersection of a Northerly Right-Of-Way line of an 18 foot wide Alley with a Westerly Right-Of-Way line of an 18 foot wide Alley; both Alleys of Record in said Plat Book 4, Page 400; Thence North 73° 59' 54" West, across said State of Ohio tract and crossing said "Reserve", a distance of 94.90 feet to a point, being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING; Thence continuing across said State of Ohio tract, the following courses and distances: North 82° 28' 17" West, a distance of 35.02 feet to a point; North 09° 17' 31" East, a distance of 80.78 feet to a point; North 09° 25' 36" East, a distance of 38.59 feet to a point; North 10° 02' 12" East, a distance of 42.12 feet to a point; North 15° 51' 47" East, a distance of 43.93 feet to a point; North 15° 08' 24" East, a distance of 37.63 feet to a point; North 15° 59' 29" East, a distance of 78.61 feet to a point; North 13° 32' 33" East, a distance of 41.80 feet to a point; North 24° 20' 52" East, a distance of 28.50 feet to a point; North 74° 10' 08" East, a distance of 45.81 feet to a point; South 24° 20' 52" West, a distance of 54.74 feet to a point; South 13° 32' 33" West, a distance of 39.24 feet to a point; South 15° 59' 29" West, a distance of 79.10 feet to a point; South 15° 08' 24" West, a distance of 37.59 feet to a point; South 15° 51' 47" West, a distance of 42.37 feet to a point; South 10° 02' 12" West, a distance of 40.15 feet to a point; South 09° 25' 36" West, a distance of 38.36 feet to a point; South 09° 17' 31" West, a distance of 79.66 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 0.323 acres, more or less, which is located in Auditor's Parcel Number 010-067017. The bearings listed herein are based on the Ohio State Plane Coordinate System, South Zone as per NAD 83 (2011). The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. (B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, and the duties to be observed and performed by the City of Columbus, Ohio, with regard to the perpetual easement, and require the City of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual responsibility for the operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing, and replacement of the Olentangy Scioto Interceptor Sewer and appurtenances thereto, that is currently located on the real estate. (C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual easement shall be $1.00. (D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall state the consideration and the terms and conditions for the granting of the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the state, be kept in the records of the Department of Administrative Services, and delivered to the City of Columbus, Ohio. The City of Columbus, Ohio shall present the perpetual easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County Recorder. The City of Columbus, Ohio shall pay the costs associated with recording the perpetual easement. (E) This section shall expire three years after its effective date. Section 11. (A) Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 123.01 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may execute a perpetual easement in the name of the state with the City of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal corporation, and its successors and assigns, for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing, and replacement of storm sewer infrastructure, burdening the following described real estate: Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, Township of Clinton, lying in Quarter Township 3, Township 1, Range 18, United States Military District, being on, over, and across Lots 5 and 6 of that plat titled "J.O. Lisle Subdivision" of record in Plat Book 5, Page 431 and that 0.716 acre tract conveyed to The State of Ohio, for the use and benefit of The Ohio State University by deed of record in Instrument Number 200009290198264, and that tract conveyed to The State of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 602, Page 463 (all references are to the records of the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio) and being more particularly described as follows: Beginning, for reference, at the centerline intersection of Kinnear Road and Kenny Road; Thence North 03° 41' 02" East, with the centerline of said Kenny Road, a distance of 977.49 feet to a point; Thence South 86° 18' 58" East, crossing said Kenny Road and that "Easement for Highway Purposes" as conveyed to the County of Franklin of record in Deed Book 3052, Page 549, to a point in the easterly right-of-way line of said Kenny Road, being the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING; Thence with said easterly right-of-way line, the following courses and distances: North 03° 41' 02" East, a distance of 15.89 feet to an angle point in said easterly right-of-way line, in the southerly line of that "Right-of-Way Easement" conveyed as Parcel No. 8 to the County of Franklin, Ohio of record in Instrument Number 201012020163433; South 86° 42' 58" East, with said southerly line, a distance of 10.00 feet to an angle point in said easterly right-of-way line; and North 03° 41' 02" East, with the easterly line of said Parcel No. 8, distance of 30.04 feet to a point; Thence crossing said State of Ohio tracts, the following courses and distances: South 86° 18' 47" East, a distance of 18.97 feet to a point; South 03° 26' 41" West, a distance of 32.05 feet to a point; South 48° 26' 01" West, a distance of 19.65 feet to a point; and North 86° 18' 47" West, a distance of 15.27 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 0.022 acre, more or less, of which 0.009 acre is from Auditor's Parcel Number 130-011864-00, and 0.013 acre is from Auditor's Parcel Number 130-011841-00. The bearings listed herein are based on the Ohio State Plane Coordinate System South Zone per NAD83 (NSRS2007). Control for bearings was from coordinates of monuments RINGLE and COC 4-83 having a bearing of South 34° 13' 31" West, established by the Franklin County Engineering Department, using Global Positioning procedures and equipment. The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. (B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, and the duties to be observed and performed by the City of Columbus, Ohio, with regard to the perpetual easement, and require the City of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual responsibility for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing, and replacement of the storm sewer infrastructure that is currently located on the real estate. (C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual easement shall be $1.00. (D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall state the consideration and the terms and conditions for the granting of the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the state, be kept in the records of the Department of Administrative Services, and delivered to the City of Columbus, Ohio. The City of Columbus, Ohio shall present the perpetual easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County Recorder. The City of Columbus, Ohio shall pay the costs associated with recording the perpetual easement. (E) This section shall expire three years after its effective date. Section 12. (A) The Director of Administrative Services is authorized to execute a perpetual easement burdening state-owned real estate under the jurisdiction of The Ohio State University, for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of a sanitary sewer pipeline, in accordance with the following guidelines: Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 123.01 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may execute a perpetual easement in the name of the state with the city of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal corporation, and its successors and assigns, for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of a sanitary sewer pipeline, burdening the following described real estate: Situated in the state of Ohio, county of Franklin, city of Columbus, lying in Quarter Township 3, Township 1, Range 18, United State Military District, being on, over, and across that 60.82 acre tract conveyed to state of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 103, Page 552 and that 79.59 acre tract conveyed to The State of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 428, Page 192, (all references are to the records of the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio) being more particularly described as follows: Beginning, for reference, in the easterly line of said 79.59 acre tract, at the southwest corner of Lot 45 of that subdivision entitled ''R.P. Woodruffs", of record in Plat Book 3, Page 421, being the westerly terminus of the northerly right-of-way line of Woodruff Avenue (60 feet in width), as dedicated by Plat Book 3, Page 421, and vacated by Ordinance Number 416-38; Thence South 03° 37' 41" West, with the westerly terminus of said Woodruff Avenue, a distance of 30.00 feet to a point at the westerly terminus of the centerline of said Woodruff Avenue, at a common corner of said 60.82 and 79.59 acre tracts; Thence South 13° 55' 11" West, with the line common to said 60.82 and 79.59 acre tracts, a distance of 179.93 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING; Thence across said 60.82 and 79.59 acre tracts, the following courses and distances: South 86° 24' 45" East, a distance of 88.00 feet to a point; South 86° 24' 00" East, a distance of 32.29 feet to a point; North 81° 20' 51" East, a distance of 68.63 feet to a point; North 03° 51' 45" East, a distance of 12.79 feet to a point; South 86° 07' 43" East, a distance of 40.00 feet to a point; South 03° 51' 45" West, a distance of 44.88 feet to a point; South 81° 20' 51" West, a distance of 105.02 feet to a point; North 86° 24' 00" West, a distance of 36.58 feet to a point; North 86° 24' 45" West, a distance of 438.94 feet to a point; and North 41° 30' 46" West, a distance of 18.74 feet to a point in the easterly right-of-way line of Olentangy River Road; Thence North 04° 39' 57" East, with said easterly right-of-way line, a distance of 55.44 feet to a point; Thence South 41° 30' 46" East, across said 79.59 acre tract, a distance of 40.60 feet to a point; Thence South 86° 24' 45" East, across said 79.59 acre tract, a distance of 334.42 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 0.561 acre, more or less, out of Auditor Parcel Numbers 010-067007 and 010-203994. The coordinates shown hereon are based on the Ohio State Plane Coordinate System, South Zone, NAD 83 (1986). Said coordinates originated from a field traverse which was tied (referenced) to said coordinate system by Static GPS observations of Franklin County Engineering Department monuments COC4-83 and RINGLE, with a bearing of North 34° 13' 31" East between said monuments. The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. (B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, and the duties to be observed and performed by the city of Columbus, Ohio, with regard to the perpetual easement, and require the city of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual responsibility for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of the sanitary sewer pipeline that is currently located on the real estate. (C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual easement shall be $1.00. (D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall state the consideration and the terms and conditions for the granting of the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the State, be kept in the records of the Department of Administrative Services, and delivered to the city of Columbus, Ohio. The city of Columbus, Ohio shall present the perpetual easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County Recorder. The city of Columbus, Ohio shall pay the costs associated with recording the perpetual easement. (E) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 13. (A) The Director of Administrative Services is authorized to execute a perpetual easement burdening state-owned real estate under the jurisdiction of The Ohio State University, for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of a thirty-inch sanitary sewer pipeline, in accordance with the following guidelines: Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 123.01 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may execute a perpetual easement in the name of the state with the city of Columbus, Ohio, an Ohio municipal corporation, and its successors and assigns, for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, use, servicing and/or replacement of a thirty-inch (30") sanitary sewer pipeline, burdening the following described real estate: 0.087-ACRE DESCRIPTION Being Situated in the state of Ohio, county of Franklin, city of Columbus, Quarter Township 3, Township 1N, Range 18W, United States Military Lands and being part of an original 56.66-acre tract as conveyed to state of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 564, Page 9 of the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at an aluminum disk in PVC encased concrete found in a monument box at an angle point in the centerline of Kenny Road (Width Varies), designation FCGS 1160, said point being part of the Franklin County Survey Control network and also being along the easterly line of an original 75.38-acre tract as conveyed to state of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 564, Page 8; Thence along the centerline of Kenny Road, the easterly line of said 75.38-acre tract, and the easterly line of an original 56.66-acre tract as conveyed to state of Ohio in Deed Book 564, Page 9, North 03° 35' 03" East for a distance of 92.12 feet to the True Point of Beginning; Thence leaving the centerline of Kenny Road and across said 56.66-acre tract for the following three courses: 1. North 87° 13' 13" West for a distance of 151.58 feet to a point; 2. North 02° 46' 47" East for a distance of 25.00 feet to a point; 3. South 87° 13' 13" East for a distance of 151.93 feet to a point in the centerline of Kenny Road and the easterly line of said 56.66-acre tract; Thence along the centerline of Kenny Road and the easterly line of said 56.66-acre tract, South 03° 35' 03" West for a distance of 25.00 feet to the True Point of Beginning, containing 0.087 acres, more or less, all of which are within Auditor's Parcel Number 010-203994, subject however to all other legal rights of way, easements and agreements of record. Bearings are based on the centerline of Kenny Road being N 03° 35' 03" E as referenced to the State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone, NAD 83 with 2011 NSRS Adjustment. 0.479-ACRE DESCRIPTION Being Situated in the state of Ohio, county of Franklin, city of Columbus, Quarter Township 3, Township 1N, Range 18W, United States Military Lands and being part of a Reserve and Lots Numbered 33-35, 39, 40, 89 & 90 as the same are numbered and delineated upon the recorded plat of Wood-Brown Place (Plat Book 5, Page 196) and also being parts of lands owned by the state of Ohio as conveyed in Deed Book 649, Pages 245, 246, 248, 249, 328 and Deed Book 694, Page 373 of the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at an aluminum disk in PVC encased concrete found in a monument box at an angle point in the centerline of Kenny Road (Width Varies), designation FCGS 1160, said point being part of the Franklin County Survey Control; Thence along the centerline of Kenny Road, North 03° 35' 03" East for a distance of 92.12 feet to a point; Thence leaving the centerline of Kenny Road, South 87° 13' 13" East for a distance of 25.00 feet to a point on the existing westerly line of said state of Ohio Lands, said point being True Point of Beginning; Thence along the existing westerly line of said state of Ohio lands, North 03° 35' 03" East for a distance of 25.00 feet to a point; Thence across said state of Ohio lands the following four courses: 1. South 87° 13' 13" East for a distance of 185.10 feet to a point; 2. North 88° 27' 19" East for a distance of 251.68 feet to a point; 3. North 70° 38' 49" East for a distance of 372.16 feet to a point; 4. North 68° 13' 01" East for a distance of 22.40 feet to a point on the easterly line of said state of Ohio lands and the existing westerly railroad right of way as partitioned to CSX Transportation, Inc. in Complete Record 8, Page 459 of the Probate Records, Franklin County, Ohio and affected by Article of Merger in Official Record 13283, Page G13 of the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio; Thence with the easterly line of said state of Ohio lands and the existing westerly railroad right of way, South 11° 29' 43" East for a distance of 25.41 feet to a point; Thence across said state of Ohio lands the following four courses: 1. South 68° 13' 01" West for a distance of 18.39 feet to a point; 2. South 70° 38' 49" West for a distance of 376.60 feet to a point; 3. South 88° 27' 19" West for a distance of 256.54 feet to a point; 4. North 87° 13' 13" West for a distance of 186.39 feet to the True Point of Beginning, containing 0.479 acres, more or less, all of which are within Auditor's Parcel Number 010-204047, subject however to all other legal rights of way, easements and agreements of record. Bearings are based on the centerline of Kenny Road being N 03° 35' 03" E as referenced to the State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone, NAD 83 with 2011 NSRS Adjustment. 0.872-ACRE DESCRIPTION Being Situated in the state of Ohio, county of Franklin, city of Columbus, Quarter Township 3, Township 1N, Range 18W, United States Military Lands and being part of an original 79.59-acre tract as conveyed to The State of Ohio by deed of record in Deed Book 428, Page 192 of the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at angle point on the existing easterly limited access right of way of State Route 315 (FRA-315-2.85) and the grantor's westerly line, said point being located 115 feet right of station 118+00.00 (FRA-315-2.85); Thence along the existing easterly limited access right of way of State Route 315 (FRA-315-2.85) and the grantor's westerly line, North 00° 02' 46" West for a distance of 251.17 feet to the True Point of Beginning; Thence continuing along the existing easterly limited access right of way of State Route 315 (FRA-315-2.85) and the grantor's westerly line, North 00° 02' 46" West for a distance of 26.64 feet to a point; Thence across the grantor's property the following eleven courses: (1) North 69° 45' 55" East for a distance of 375.30 feet; (2) South 80° 21' 24" East for a distance of 287.18 feet; (3) North 76° 50' 24" East for a distance of 124.49 feet; (4) South 86° 07' 10" East for a distance of 331.14 feet; (5) South 86° 20' 13" East for a distance of 402.48 feet; (6) South 03° 39' 47" West for a distance of 25.00 feet; (7) North 86° 20' 13" West for a distance of 402.52 feet; (8) North 86° 07' 10" West for a distance of 327.44 feet; (9) South 76° 50' 24" West for a distance of 125.78 feet; (10) North 80° 21' 24" West for a distance of 285.55 feet; (11) South 69° 45' 55" West for a distance of 377.82 feet to the True Point of Beginning, containing 0.872 acres, more or less, all of which are within Auditor's Parcel Number 010-203994, subject however to all other legal rights of way, easements and agreements of record. Bearings are based on the centerline of State Route 315 being N 06° 58' 10" W as referenced to the State Plane Coordinate System, Ohio South Zone, NAD 83 with 2011 NSRS Adjustment. Stations are based on ODOT Right of Way Plan Set "FRA-315-2.85", dated March 03, 1973. The foregoing legal descriptions may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. (B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, and the duties to be observed and performed by, the city of Columbus, Ohio with regard to the perpetual easement, and require the city of Columbus, Ohio to assume perpetual responsibility for the installation, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction, servicing and/or replacement of the thirty-inch (30") sanitary sewer pipeline that is currently located on the real estate. (C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual easement shall be $1.00. (D) The Director of the Department of Administrative Services shall prepare the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall state the consideration and the terms and conditions for the granting of the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the state, be kept in the records of the Department of Administrative Services, and delivered to the city of Columbus, Ohio. The city of Columbus, Ohio shall present the perpetual easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County Recorder. The city of Columbus, Ohio shall pay the costs associated with recording the perpetual easement. (E) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Section 14. (A) The Director of Administrative Services is authorized to execute a perpetual easement burdening state-owned real estate under the jurisdiction of The Ohio State University, for the installation, construction, reconstruction, use, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, removal, servicing and improvement of one twenty-inch natural gas pipeline with a maximum operating pressure of 190 psig, two twelve-inch natural gas pipelines, one eight-inch natural gas pipeline, one two-inch natural gas pipeline, two gas house facilities and two valves, in accordance with the following guidelines: Notwithstanding division (A)(5) of section 123.01 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may execute a perpetual easement in the name of the State with Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc., an Ohio corporation, and its successors and assigns, for the installation, construction, reconstruction, use, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, removal, servicing, and improvement of one twenty-inch natural gas pipeline with a maximum operating pressure of 190 psig, two twelve-inch natural gas pipelines, one eight-inch natural gas pipeline, one two-inch natural gas pipeline, two gas house facilities and two valves, burdening the following described real estate: 2.583-ACRE DESCRIPTION Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United States Military Lands, being a 40 foot wide Pipeline Easement to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of The State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-203996) as conveyed to them by deed in Deed Vol. 942, Page 326 as recorded in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing in a ¾ inch iron rod found in the intersection of the Northerly right-of-way of Zollinger Road (As dedicated by the plat of Wright Place, PB40, Pg4) and the Southwesterly corner of Lot 4 of said Wright Place, THENCE; Leaving said intersection, and in the Westerly line of said Wright Place, and the Westerly line of Section 3, South 03° 07' 21" West, 12.52 feet to a point in the Northwesterly corner of said State of Ohio lands, and being THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described 40' Pipeline Easement, THENCE; (1) Leaving the Westerly line of said Wright Place, and in the Northerly line of said State of Ohio lands, South 86° 23' 34" East, 2336.70 feet to a point in the Northerly extension of the Westerly line of Kenny Road (ROW Varies), THENCE; (2) Leaving said Northerly line, and in said Westerly right-of-way-line, South 33° 49' 27" East, 151.29 feet to a point, THENCE; (3) Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 37° 57' 29" East, 190.98 feet to a point, THENCE; (4) Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 26° 19' 17" East, 152.69 feet to a point, THENCE; (5) Leaving said Westerly right-of-way, and over and across the lands of the aforementioned State of Ohio, South 82° 38' 04" West, 45.50 feet to a point, THENCE; (6) Continuing in said easement line, North 25° 01' 19" West, 133.73 feet to a point, THENCE; (7) Continuing in said easement line, North 38° 21' 18" West 188.34 feet to a point, THENCE; (8) Continuing in said easement line, North 33° 19' 52" West, 133.35 feet to a point, THENCE; (9) Continuing in said easement line, North 86° 23' 34" West 2316.39 feet to a point in the Westerly line of the Grantor, also being the Westerly line of said Section 3, THENCE; (10) In said Westerly line, North 3° 07' 21" East, 40.00 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Pipeline Easement, containing 112,533.64 Sq. Ft. or 2.583 Acres of land. Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions of record. Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 942, Page 326 Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 2023.0425, resulting in the Northerly line of the State of Ohio being South 86° 23' 34" East. The above legal description is the result of an actual field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 in April of 2023. 0.051-ACRE DESCRIPTION Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United States Military Lands, being a Gas Facilities and Regulator Easement granted to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of The State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-203996) as conveyed to them by deed in Deed Vol. 942, Page 326 as recorded in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing in a 3/4 inch iron rod found in the intersection of the Northerly right-of-way of Zollinger Road (As dedicated by the plat of Wright Place, PB40, Pg4) and the Southwesterly corner of Lot 4 of said Wright Place, THENCE; Leaving said intersection, and in the Westerly line of said Wright Place, and the Westerly line of Section 3, South 03° 07' 21" West, 12.52 feet to a point, THENCE; Leaving the Westerly line of said Wright Place, South 86° 23' 34" East, 2336.70 feet to a point in the Westerly line of Kenny Road (ROW Varies), THENCE; In said Westerly right-of-way-line, South 33° 49' 27" East, 151.29 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 37° 57' 29" East, 190.98 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 26° 19' 17" East, 152.69 feet to a point, being THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described gas facilities and regulator easement, THENCE; (1) Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 26° 19' 17" East, 16.36 feet to a point, THENCE; (2) Continuing in said Westerly right-of-way line, South 16° 03' 22" East, 34.93 feet to a point, THENCE; (3) Leaving said Westerly right-of-way line, in the said easement line and over and across the lands of the State of Ohio, South 82° 38' 04" West 40.46 feet to a point, THENCE; (4) Continuing in said easement line, North 24° 43' 22" West, 52.39 feet to a point in the Southwesterly corner of a 40' pipeline easement, THENCE; (5) In the Southerly line of said 40' pipeline easement, North 82° 38' 04" East 45.50 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Gas Facilities and Regulator Easement, containing 2,200.02 Sq. Ft. or 0.051 Acres of land. Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions of record. Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 942, Page 326 Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 2023.0425, resulting in the Northerly line of the State of Ohio being South 86° 23' 34" East. The above legal description is the result of an actual field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 in April of 2023. 0.923-ACRE DESCRIPTION Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United States Military Lands, being a variable width Pipeline Easement to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of The State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-204024) as conveyed to them by deed in Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222 as recorded in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing in a found three-fourths inch iron pipe in the intersection of the Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road. (variable ROW) and the Westerly right-of-way line of CSX Railroad (FKA Chesapeake and Ohio Railroad), THENCE; Leaving said Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, and in said Westerly right-of-way line of said CSX Railroad, South 11° 28' 15" East, 208.57 feet to a point, said point being 101.38 feet right of centerline station 99+63.00 (Ackerman Road) and 50 feet left of station 227+17.14 of CSX Railroad as shown on SR 315 plans FRA-315-2.85-6.1 (1969), recorded in Plat Book 41, Page 28 of the Franklin County Recorder's Office, also being THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Pipeline Easement, THENCE; (1) Leaving the Southerly right-of-way line of said Ackerman Road, and in said Westerly right-of-way line of CSX Railroad, South 11° 38' 11" East, 5.15 feet to a point, THENCE; (2) Leaving Westerly right-of-way line, and in the line of the herein described Pipeline Easement, North 88° 37' 20" West, 632.50 feet to a point, THENCE; (3) Continuing in said Easement line, North 01° 22' 41" East, 35.50 feet to a point, THENCE; (4) Continuing in said Easement line, North 87° 55' 26" West, 30.84 feet to a point, THENCE; (5) Continuing in said Easement line, North 85° 00' 46" West, 107.98 feet to a point in the Easterly right-of-way line of Kenny Road (ROW Varies), THENCE; (6) In said Easterly right-of-way line, North 29° 48' 03" West, 30.17 feet to a point, THENCE; (7) In a line that transitions from the Easterly right-of-way line of Kenny Road to the Southerly right-of-way line of the aforementioned Ackerman Road, North 48° 23' 04" East, 34.71 feet to a point in the Southerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, THENCE; (8) Continuing in said Southerly right-of-way line, South 84° 05' 33" East 100.08 feet to a point, THENCE; (9) Continuing in said Southerly right-of-way line, South 88° 40' 26" East 100.08 feet to a point, THENCE; (10) Continuing in said Southerly right-of-way line, South 82° 39' 48" East 200.34 feet to a point, THENCE; (11) Continuing in said Southerly right-of-way line, South 79° 24' 51" East, 365.79 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Pipeline Easement, containing 40,187.03 Sq. Ft. or 0.923 Acres of land. Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions of record. Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222 Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 2023.1212, resulting in the centerline of Ackerman Road being South 86° 23' 00" East. The above legal description is the result of an actual field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 in December of 2023. 2.319-ACRE DESCRIPTION Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United States Military Lands, being a 50' wide Pipeline Easement to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of The State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-062731) as conveyed to them by deed in Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 as recorded in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing in a found ¾ inch iron pipe in the intersection of the Northerly right-of-way of Ackerman Road (variable ROW) and the Easterly right-of-way of State Route 315 (SR315), THENCE; Leaving said Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, and in a tie-line, South 16° 50' 22" East, 170.68 feet to a point, said point being 70.00 feet right of centerline station 107+10.00 (Ackerman Road) and 364.65 feet right of station 172+01.48 of State Route 315 as shown on SR 315 plans FRA-315-2.85-6.1 (1969), recorded in Plat Book 41, Page 28 of the Franklin County Recorder's Office, also being THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Pipeline Easement, THENCE; Leaving said Easterly right-of-way line of SR315, and in the Southerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, North 89° 06' 10" East, 190.59 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, North 89° 53' 52" East, 200.42 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 84° 05' 34" East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 88° 40' 26" East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" East, 200.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 85° 27' 42" East, 495.54 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 79° 25' 21" East, 93.73 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 64° 37' 23" East, 151.47 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 87° 02' 07" East, 25.58 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, In a curve to the right, having a radius of 608.86 feet, an arc length of 69.11 feet, and a delta angle of 06° 30' 14", also having a chord bearing South 55° 43' 12" East, with a chord distance of 69.08 feet to a point, THENCE; Leaving said Southerly right-of-way-line, and in the line of the herein described Pipeline Easement, South 38° 03' 22" West, 28.64 feet to a point in the Northeasterly corner of the existing Gas Facilities and Regulator Easement, THENCE; In the Northerly line of said Easement, North 88° 14' 34" West, 55.00 feet to a point in the Northwesterly corner of said station, THENCE; Leaving said station and over and across the lands of the aforementioned State of Ohio, North 64° 19' 55" West, 180.19 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said easement line, North 79° 25' 21" West, 84.59 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said easement line, North 85° 27' 42" West, 492.50 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said easement line, North 86° 23' 00" West, 198.60 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said easement line, North 88° 40' 26" West, 201.16 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said easement line, North 84° 05' 34" West, 201.16 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said easement line, North 86° 23' 00" West, 97.38 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said easement line, South 89° 53' 52" West, 200.42 feet, to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said easement line, North 86° 23' 00" West, 99.65 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said easement line, South 89° 04' 29" West, 212.08 feet to a point in the aforementioned Easterly right-of-way of SR315, THENCE; In said Easterly right-of-way line, North 24° 11' 27" East, 55.32 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Pipeline Easement, containing 101,040.12 Sq. Ft. or 2.319 Acres of land. Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions of record. Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 2023.1212, resulting in the centerline of Ackerman Road being South 86° 23' 00" East. The above legal description is the result of an actual field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 in December of 2023. 0.111-ACRE DESCRIPTION Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United States Military Lands, being an Access Easement to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of The State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-062731) as conveyed to them by deed in Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 as recorded in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing in a found ¾ inch iron pipe in the intersection of the Northerly right-of-way of Ackerman Road (variable ROW) and the Easterly right-of-way of State Route 315 (SR315), THENCE; Leaving said Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, and in a tie-line, South 16° 50' 22" East, 170.68 feet to a point, said point being 70.00 feet right of centerline station 107+10.00 (Ackerman Road) and 364.65 feet right of station 172+01.48 of State Route 315 as shown on SR 315 plans FRA-315-2.85-6.1 (1969), recorded in Plat Book 41, Page 28 of the Franklin County Recorder's Office, THENCE; Leaving said Easterly right-of-way line of SR315, and in the Southerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, North 89° 06' 10" East, 190.59 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, North 89° 53' 52" East, 200.42 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 84° 05' 34" East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 88° 40' 26" East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" East, 200.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 85° 27' 42" East, 495.54 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 79° 25' 21" East, 93.73 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 64° 37' 23" East, 100.06 feet to a point, also being THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Access Easement, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 64° 37' 23" East, 21.73 feet to a point, THENCE; Leaving said right-of-way line, and over and across the lands of the aforementioned State of Ohio, in the line of the herein described Access Easement, South 02° 21' 13" West, 87.66 feet to a point, THENCE; South 88° 14' 34" East, 39.96 feet to a point in the Westerly line of the existing Gas Facilities and Regulator Easement, THENCE; In the Westerly line of said Easement, North 88° 14' 34" West, 60.48 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing over and across the lands of the aforementioned State of Ohio, North 02° 21' 13" East, 146.34 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Access Easement, containing 4,851.11 Sq. Ft. or 0.111 Acres of land. Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions of record. Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 2023.1212, resulting in the centerline of Ackerman Road being South 86° 23' 00" East. The above legal description is the result of an actual field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 in December of 2023. 0.082-ACRE DESCRIPTION Situated in the State of Ohio, County of Franklin, City of Columbus, Section 3, Township 1 North, Range 18 West, United States Military Lands, being a Gas Facilities and Regulator Easement to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. in, over and across the lands of The State of Ohio (Parcel No. 010-062731) as conveyed to them by deed in Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 as recorded in the Recorder's Office, Franklin County, Ohio, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing in a found ¾ inch iron pipe in the intersection of the Northerly right-of-way of Ackerman Road (variable ROW) and the Easterly right-of-way of State Route 315 (SR315), THENCE; Leaving said Northerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, and in a tie-line, South 16° 50' 22" East, 170.68 feet to a point, said point being 70.00 feet right of centerline station 107+10.00 (Ackerman Road) and 364.65 feet right of station 172+01.48 of State Route 315 as shown on SR 315 plans FRA-315-2.85-6.1 (1969), recorded in Plat Book 41, Page 28 of the Franklin County Recorder's Office, THENCE; Leaving said Easterly right-of-way line of SR315, and in the Southerly right-of-way line of Ackerman Road, North 89° 06' 10" East, 190.59 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, North 89° 53' 52" East, 200.42 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" East, 100.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 84° 05' 34" East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 88° 40' 26" East 200.16 feet to a point, THENCE;` Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 86° 23' 00" East, 200.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 85° 27' 42" East, 495.54 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 79° 25' 21" East, 93.73 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 64° 37' 23" East, 151.47 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, South 87° 02' 07" East, 25.58 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing in said right-of-way line, In a curve to the right, having a radius of 608.86 feet, an arc length of 69.11 feet, and a delta angle of 06° 30' 14", also having a chord bearing South 55° 43' 12" East, with a chord distance of 69.08 feet to a point, THENCE; Leaving said Southerly right-of-way-line, and in the Easterly line of a Pipeline Easement, South 38° 03' 22" West, 28.64 feet to a point, being the Northeasterly corner, and THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Gas Facilities and Regulator Easement, THENCE; Continuing over and across the lands of the aforementioned State of Ohio and in the Easterly line of said Easement, South 01° 45' 26" West, 65.00 feet to a point, THENCE; Continuing over and across the lands of the aforementioned State of Ohio, North 88° 14' 34" West, 55.00 feet to a point in the Easterly line of an Access Easement, THENCE; In said Easterly line, North 01° 45' 26" East, 65.00 feet to a point, THENCE; South 88° 14' 34" East, 55.00 feet to THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING of the herein described Gas Facilities and Regulator Easement, containing 3,575.00 Sq. Ft. or 0.082 Acres of land. Subject to all legal highways, easements and restrictions of record. Prior Deeds: Deed Vol. 2077, Page 222; Bk. 616, Pg. 399; Bk. 804, Pg. 360; Bk. 966, Pg. 339, Deed Vol. 2077, Page 226 Bearings are based on Geodetic North derived from GPS/RTN observations using ODOT CORS network stations, converted to the Ohio State Plane South Zone, Horizontal Datum NAD83(2011) epoch 2023.1212, resulting in the centerline of Ackerman Road being South 86° 23' 00" East. The above legal description is the result of an actual field survey made under the direction of Scott R. Lindgren of Metro Consulting Associates, Ohio Registered Surveyor No. 7853 in December of 2023. The foregoing legal descriptions may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the perpetual easement. (B) The perpetual easement shall state the obligations of, and the duties to be observed and performed by Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc., with regard to the perpetual easement, and require Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. to assume perpetual responsibility for the installation, construction, reconstruction, use, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, removal, servicing and improvement of one (1) twenty-inch (20") natural gas pipeline with a maximum operating pressure of 190 psig, two (2) twelve-inch (12") natural gas pipelines, one (1) eight-inch (8") natural gas pipeline, one (1) two-inch (2") natural gas pipeline, two (2) gas house facilities and two (2) valves that are currently located on the real estate. (C) Consideration for the granting of the perpetual easement shall be at a price acceptable to the Director of Administrative Services and Board of Trustees of The Ohio State University. (D) The Director of Administrative Services shall prepare the perpetual easement. The perpetual easement shall be executed by the Director of Administrative Services in the name of the State, be kept in the records of the Department of Administrative Services, and delivered to Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc. Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc., shall present the perpetual easement for recording in the Office of the Franklin County Recorder. Columbia Gas of Ohio, Inc., shall pay the costs associated with recording the perpetual easement. (E) This section shall expire 3 years after its effective date. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. This act is not of a general and permanent nature and does not require a code section number. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________